Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB212.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 161.155 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Teacher" shall mean any person for whom certification is required as a basis
of employment in the common schools of the state;
(b) "Employee" shall mean any person, other than a teacher, employed in the
public schools, whether on a full or part-time basis;
(c) "Immediate family" shall mean the teacher's or employee's spouse, children
including stepchildren and foster children, grandchildren, daughters-in-law
and sons-in law, brothers and sisters, parents and spouse's parents, and
grandparents and spouse's grandparents, without reference to the location or
residence of said relative, and any other blood relative who resides in the
teacher's or employee's home;
(d) "Sick leave bank" shall mean an aggregation of sick leave days contributed by
teachers or employees for use by teachers or employees who have exhausted
all sick leave and other available paid leave days; and
(e) "Assault" shall mean an act that intentionally causes injury so significant that
the victim is determined to be, by certification of a physician or surgeon duly
qualified under KRS Chapter 342, incapable of performing the duties of his or
her job.
(2) Each district board of education shall allow to each teacher and full-time employee
in its common school system not less than ten (10) days of sick leave during each
school year, without deduction of salary. Sick leave shall be granted to a teacher or
employee if he or she presents a personal statement or a certificate of a physician
stating that the teacher or employee was ill, that the teacher or employee was absent
for the purpose of attending to a member of his or her immediate family who was
Page 1 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
ill, or for the purpose of mourning a member of his or her immediate family. The
ten (10) days of sick leave granted in this subsection may be taken by a teacher or
employee on any ten (10) days of the school year and shall be granted in addition to
accumulated sick leave days that have been credited to the teacher or employee
under the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.
(3) A school district shall coordinate among the income and benefits from workers'
compensation, temporary disability retirement, and district payroll and benefits so
that there is no loss of income or benefits to a teacher or employee for work time
lost because of an assault while performing the teacher's or employee's assigned
duties for a period of up to one (1) year after the assault. In the event a teacher or
employee suffers an assault while performing his or her assigned duties that results
in injuries that qualify the teacher or employee for workers' compensation benefits,
the district shall provide leave to the teacher or employee for up to one (1) year
after the assault with no loss of income or benefits under the following conditions:
(a) The district shall pay the salary of the teacher or employee between the time
of the assault and the time the teacher's or employee's workers' compensation
income benefits take effect, or the time the teacher or employee is certified to
return to work by a physician or surgeon duly qualified under KRS Chapter
342, whichever is sooner;
(b) The district shall pay, for up to one (1) year from the time of the assault, the
difference between the salary of the teacher or employee and any workers'
compensation income benefits received by the teacher or employee resulting
from the assault. Payments by the district shall include payments for
intermittent work time missed as a result of the assault during the one (1) year
period. If the teacher's or employee's workers' compensation income benefits
cease during the one (1) year period after the assault, the district shall also
cease to make payments under this paragraph;
Page 2 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(c) The Commonwealth, through the Kentucky Department of Education, shall
make the employer's health insurance contribution during the period that the
district makes payments under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection;
(d) The Commonwealth, through the Kentucky Department of Education, shall
make the employer's contribution to the retirement system in which the
teacher or employee is a member during the period that the district makes
payments under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection; and
(e) Payments to a teacher or employee under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection shall be coordinated with workers' compensation benefits under
KRS Chapter 342, disability retirement benefits for teachers under KRS
161.661 to 161.663, and disability retirement benefits for employees under
KRS 61.600 to 61.621 and 78.5522, 78.5524, 78.5526, 78.5528, and 78.5530
so that the teacher or employee receives income equivalent to his or her full
contracted salary, but in no event shall the combined payments exceed one
hundred percent (100%) of the teacher's or employee's full contracted salary.
(4) Days of sick leave not taken by an employee or a teacher during any school year
shall accumulate without limitation and be credited to that employee or teacher.
Accumulated sick leave may be taken in any school year. Any district board of
education may, in its discretion, allow employees or teachers in its common school
system sick leave in excess of the number of days prescribed in this section and
may allow school district employees and teachers to use up to three (3) days' sick
leave per school year for emergency leave pursuant to KRS 161.152(3). Any
accumulated sick leave days credited to an employee or a teacher shall remain so
credited in the event he or she transfers his or her place of employment from one (1)
school district to another within the state or to the Kentucky Department of
Education or transfers from the Department of Education to a school district.
(5) Accumulated days of sick leave shall be granted to a teacher or employee if, prior to
Page 3 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
the opening day of the school year, a statement or a certificate of a physician is
presented to the district board of education, stating that the teacher or employee is
unable to commence his or her duties on the opening day of the school year, but
will be able to assume his or her duties within a period of time that the board
determines to be reasonable.
(6) Any school teacher or employee may repurchase previously used sick leave days
with the concurrence of the local school board by paying to the district an amount
equal to the total of all costs associated with the used sick leave.
(7) A district board of education may adopt a plan for a sick leave bank. The plan may
include limitations upon the number of days a teacher or employee may annually
contribute to the bank and limitations upon the number of days a teacher or
employee may annually draw from the bank. Only those teachers or employees who
contribute to the bank may draw upon the bank. Days contributed will be deducted
from the days available to the contributing teacher or employee. The sick leave
bank shall be administered in accordance with a policy adopted by the board of
education.
(8) (a) A district board of education shall establish a sick leave donation program to
permit teachers or employees to voluntarily contribute sick leave to teachers
or employees in the same school district who are in need of an extended
absence from school. A teacher or employee who has accrued more than
fifteen (15) days' sick leave may request the board of education to transfer a
designated amount of sick leave to another teacher or employee who is
authorized to receive the sick leave donated. A teacher or employee may not
request an amount of sick leave be donated that reduces his or her sick leave
balance to less than fifteen (15) days.
(b) A teacher or employee may receive donations of sick leave if:
1. a. The teacher or employee or a member of his or her immediate
Page 4 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
family suffers from a medically certified illness, injury,
impairment, or physical or mental condition that has caused or is
likely to cause the teacher or employee to be absent for at least ten
(10) days; or
b. The teacher or employee suffers from a catastrophic loss to his or
her personal or real property, due to either a natural disaster or fire,
that either has caused or will likely cause the employee to be
absent for at least ten (10) consecutive working days;
2. The teacher's or employee's need for the absence and use of leave are
certified by a licensed physician for leave requested under subparagraph
1.a. of this subsection;
3. The teacher or employee has exhausted his or her accumulated sick
leave, personal leave, and any other leave granted by the school district;
and
4. The teacher or employee has complied with the school district's policies
governing the use of sick leave.
(c) While a teacher or employee is on sick leave provided by this section, he or
she shall be considered a school district employee, and his or her salary,
wages, and other employee benefits shall not be affected.
(d) Any sick leave that remains unused, is not needed by a teacher or employee,
and will not be needed in the future shall be returned to the teacher or
employee donating the sick leave.
(e) The board of education shall adopt policies and procedures necessary to
implement the sick leave donation program.
(9) A teacher or employee may use up to thirty (30) days of sick leave following the
birth or adoption of a child or children. Additional days may be used when the need
is verified by a physician's statement.
Page 5 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(10) (a) After July 1, 1982, a district board of education may compensate, at the time
of retirement or upon the death of a member in active contributing status at
the time of death who was eligible to retire by reason of service, an employee
or a teacher, or the estate of an employee or teacher, for each unused sick
leave day. The rate of compensation for each unused sick leave day shall be
based on a percentage of the daily salary rate calculated from the employee's
or teacher's last annual salary, not to exceed thirty percent (30%).
(b) [Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, ]Payment for unused
sick leave days under this subsection shall be incorporated into the annual
salary of the final year of service for inclusion in the calculation of the
employee's or teacher's retirement allowance only at the time of his or her
initial retirement, provided that the member makes the regular retirement
contribution for members on the sick leave payment. The accumulation of
these days includes unused sick leave days held by the employee or teacher at
the time of implementation of the program.
(c)[ For a teacher or employee who becomes a nonuniversity member of the
Teachers' Retirement System on or after January 1, 2022, as provided by KRS
161.220, payment for unused sick leave days under this subsection shall not
be incorporated into the annual compensation used to calculate the teacher's or
employee's retirement allowance in the foundational benefit component as
described by KRS 161.633 but may be deposited into the nonuniversity
member's supplemental benefit component as provided by KRS 161.635.
(d)] For a teacher or employee who begins employment with a local school district
on or after July 1, 2008, the maximum amount of unused sick leave days a
district board of education may recognize in calculating the payment of
compensation to the teacher or employee under this subsection shall not
exceed three hundred (300) days.
Page 6 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(11) Any statute to the contrary notwithstanding, employees and teachers who
transferred from the Department of Education to a school district, from a school
district to the Department of Education, or from one (1) school district to another
school district after July 15, 1981, shall receive credit for any unused sick leave to
which the employee or teacher was entitled on the date of transfer. This credit shall
be for the purposes set forth in subsection (10) of this section.
(12) The death benefit provided in subsection (10) of this section may be cited as the
Baughn Benefit.
Section 2. KRS 161.220 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 161.220 to 161.716 and 161.990:
(1) "Retirement system" means the arrangement provided for in KRS 161.220 to
161.716 and 161.990 for payment of allowances to members;
(2) "Retirement allowance" means the amount annually payable during the course of
his or her natural life to a member who has been retired by reason of service;
(3) "Disability allowance" means the amount annually payable to a member retired by
reason of disability;
(4) "Member" means the commissioner of education, deputy commissioners, associate
commissioners, and all division directors in the State Department of Education,
employees participating in the system pursuant to KRS 196.167(3)(b)1., and any
full-time teacher or professional occupying a position requiring certification or
graduation from a four (4) year college or university, as a condition of employment,
and who is employed by public boards, institutions, or agencies as follows:
(a) Local boards of education and public charter schools if the public charter
school satisfies the criteria set by the Internal Revenue Service to participate
in a governmental retirement plan;
(b) Eastern Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, Morehead State
University, Murray State University, Western Kentucky University, and any
Page 7 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
community colleges established under the control of these universities;
(c) State-operated secondary area vocational education or area technology
centers, Kentucky School for the Blind, and Kentucky School for the Deaf;
(d) Other public education agencies as created by the General Assembly and
those members of the administrative staff of the Teachers' Retirement System
of the State of Kentucky whom the board of trustees may designate by
administrative regulation;
(e) Regional cooperative organizations formed by local boards of education or
other public educational institutions listed in this subsection, for the purpose
of providing educational services to the participating organizations;
(f) All full-time members of the staffs of the Kentucky Association of School
Administrators, Kentucky Education Association, Kentucky Vocational
Association, Kentucky High School Athletic Association, Kentucky
Academic Association, and the Kentucky School Boards Association who
were members of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System or were
qualified for a position covered by the system at the time of employment by
the association in the event that the board of directors of the respective
association petitions to be included. The board of trustees of the Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System may designate by resolution whether part-time
employees of the petitioning association are to be included. The state shall
make no contributions on account of these employees, either full-time or part-
time. The association shall make the employer's contributions, including any
contribution that is specified under KRS 161.550. The provisions of this
paragraph shall be applicable to persons in the employ of the associations on
or subsequent to July 1, 1972;
(g) Employees of the Council on Postsecondary Education who were employees
of the Department for Adult Education and Literacy and who were members
Page 8 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System at the time the department was
transferred to the council pursuant to Executive Order 2003-600;
(h) The Office of Career and Technical Education;
(i) The Office of Vocational Rehabilitation;
(j) The Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children;
(k) The Governor's Scholars Program;
(l) Any person who is retired for service from the retirement system and is
reemployed by an employer identified in this subsection in a position that the
board of trustees deems to be a member[, except that any person who becomes
a member on or after January 1, 2022, and subsequently draws a monthly
lifetime retirement allowance, shall upon reemployment after retirement not
earn a second retirement account];
(m) Employees of the former Cabinet for Workforce Development who are
transferred to the Kentucky Community and Technical College System and
who occupy positions covered by the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System
shall remain in the Teachers' Retirement System. New employees occupying
these positions, as well as newly created positions qualifying for Teachers'
Retirement System coverage that would have previously been included in the
former Cabinet for Workforce Development, shall be members of the
Teachers' Retirement System;
(n) Effective January 1, 1998, employees of state community colleges who are
transferred to the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall
continue to participate in federal old age, survivors, disability, and hospital
insurance, and a retirement plan other than the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement
System offered by Kentucky Community and Technical College System. New
employees occupying positions in the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System as referenced in KRS 164.5807(5) that would not have
Page 9 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
previously been included in the former Cabinet for Workforce Development,
shall participate in federal old age, survivors, disability, and hospital
insurance and have a choice at the time of employment of participating in a
retirement plan provided by the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System, including participation in the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System,
on the same basis as faculty of the state universities as provided in KRS
161.540 and 161.620;
(o) Employees of the Office of General Counsel, the Office of Budget and
Administrative Services, and the Office of Quality and Human Resources
within the Office of the Secretary of the former Cabinet for Workforce
Development and the commissioners of the former Department for Adult
Education and Literacy and the former Department for Technical Education
who were contributing to the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System as of
July 15, 2000;
(p) Employees of the Kentucky Department of Education only who are graduates
of a four (4) year college or university, notwithstanding a substitution clause
within a job classification, and who are serving in a professional job
classification as defined by the department;
(q) The Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program;
(r) Employees of the Office of Adult Education within the Department of
Workforce Development in the Education and Labor Cabinet who were
employees of the Council on Postsecondary Education, Kentucky Adult
Education Program and who were members of the Kentucky Teachers'
Retirement System at the time the Program was transferred to the cabinet
pursuant to Executive Orders 2019-0026 and 2019-0027; and
(s) Employees of the Education Professional Standards Board who were
members of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System at the time the
Page 10 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
employees were transferred to the Kentucky Department of Education
pursuant to Executive Order 2020-590;
(5) "Present teacher" means any teacher who was a teacher on or before July 1, 1940,
and became a member of the retirement system created by 1938 (1st Extra. Sess.)
Ky. Acts ch. 1, on the date of the inauguration of the system or within one (1) year
after that date, and any teacher who was a member of a local teacher retirement
system in the public elementary or secondary schools of the state on or before July
1, 1940, and continued to be a member of the system until he or she, with the
membership of the local retirement system, became a member of the state Teachers'
Retirement System or who becomes a member under the provisions of KRS
161.470(4);
(6) "New teacher" means any member not a present teacher;
(7) "Prior service" means the number of years during which the member was a teacher
in Kentucky prior to July 1, 1941, except that not more than thirty (30) years' prior
service shall be allowed or credited to any teacher;
(8) "Subsequent service" means the number of years during which the teacher is a
member of the Teachers' Retirement System after July 1, 1941;
(9) "Final average salary" means the average of the five (5) highest annual salaries
which the member has received for service in a covered position and on which the
member has made contributions, or on which the public board, institution, or
agency has picked-up member contributions pursuant to KRS 161.540(2), or the
average of the five (5) years of highest salaries as defined in KRS 61.680(2)(a),
which shall include picked-up member contributions. Additionally, the board of
trustees may approve a final average salary based upon the average of the three (3)
highest salaries for[ individuals who become] members[ prior to January 1, 2022,]
who are at least fifty-five (55) years of age and have a minimum of twenty-seven
(27) years of Kentucky service credit. However, if any of the five (5) or three (3)
Page 11 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
highest annual salaries used to calculate the final average salary was paid within the
three (3) years immediately prior to the date of the member's retirement[ for
individuals who become members prior to January 1, 2022, or within the five (5)
years immediately prior to the date of the member's retirement for individuals who
become members on or after January 1, 2022], the amount of salary to be included
for each of those three (3) years [or five (5) years, as applicable, ]for the purpose of
calculating the final average salary shall be limited to the lesser of:
(a) The member's actual salary; or
(b) The member's annual salary that was used for retirement purposes during each
of the prior three (3) years [or five (5) years, as applicable, ]plus a percentage
increase equal to the percentage increase received by all other members
employed by the public board, institution, or agency, or for members of
school districts, the highest percentage increase received by members on any
one (1) rank and step of the salary schedule of the school district. The increase
shall be computed on the salary that was used for retirement purposes. The
board of trustees may promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to establish a methodology for measuring the
limitation so that the combined increases in salary for each of the last three (3)
full years of salary prior to retirement shall not exceed the total permissible
percentage increase received by other members of the employer for the same
three (3) year period.
For individuals who became members of the retirement system prior to July 1,
2021, this limitation shall not apply if the member receives an increase in salary in a
percentage exceeding that received by the other members, and this increase was
accompanied by a corresponding change in position or in length of employment.
The board of trustees may promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to provide definitions for a corresponding change in
Page 12 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
position or in length of employment. This limitation shall also not apply to the
payment to a member for accrued annual leave if the individual becomes a member
before July 1, 2008, or accrued sick leave which is authorized by statute and which
shall[, for individuals subject to KRS 161.155(10) who became nonuniversity
members of the system prior to January 1, 2022,] be included as part of a retiring
member's annual compensation for the member's last year of active service as
provided by Section 1 of this Act;
(10) "Annual compensation" means the total salary received by a member as
compensation for all services performed in employment covered by the retirement
system during a fiscal year. Annual compensation shall not include payment for any
benefit or salary adjustments made by the public board, institution, or agency to the
member or on behalf of the member which is not available as a benefit or salary
adjustment to other members employed by that public board, institution, or agency.
Annual compensation shall not include the salary supplement received by a member
under KRS 157.197(2)(c), 158.6455, or 158.782 on or after July 1, 1996. Under no
circumstances shall annual compensation include compensation that is earned by a
member while on assignment to an organization or agency that is not a public
board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4) of this section. In the event that
federal law requires that a member continue membership in the retirement system
even though the member is on assignment to an organization or agency that is not a
public board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4) of this section, the
member's annual compensation for retirement purposes shall be deemed to be the
annual compensation, as limited by subsection (9) of this section, last earned by the
member while still employed solely by and providing services directly to a public
board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4) of this section. The board of
trustees shall determine if any benefit or salary adjustment qualifies as annual
compensation. For an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008,
Page 13 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
annual compensation shall not include lump-sum payments upon termination of
employment for accumulated annual or compensatory leave;
(11) "Age of member" means the age attained on the first day of the month immediately
following the birthdate of the member. This definition is limited to retirement
eligibility and does not apply to tenure of members;
(12) "Employ," and derivatives thereof, means relationships under which an individual
provides services to an employer as an employee, as an independent contractor, as
an employee of a third party, or under any other arrangement as long as the services
provided to the employer are provided in a position that would otherwise be
covered by the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System and as long as the services
are being provided to a public board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4)
of this section;
(13) "Regular interest" means:
(a) For an individual who becomes a member prior to July 1, 2008, interest at
three percent (3%) per annum; and[:]
(b) For an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008, [but prior
to January 1, 2022, ]interest at two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum for
purposes of crediting interest to the teacher savings account or any other
contributions made by the employee that are refundable to the employee upon
termination of employment[; and
(c) For an individual who becomes a member on or after January 1, 2022, the
rolling five (5) year yield on a thirty (30) year United States Treasury bond as
of the end of May prior to the most recently completed fiscal year, except
that:
1. Once the member has at least sixty (60) months of service in the system
it shall mean interest at two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum for
purposes of crediting interest to employee contributions in the
Page 14 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
foundational benefit component or any other contributions made by the
employee to the foundational benefit component that are refundable to
the employee upon termination of employment; and
2. The board shall have the authority to adjust the regular interest rate for
individuals who become members on or after January 1, 2022, in
accordance with KRS 161.633 and 161.634];
(14) "Accumulated contributions" means the contributions of a member to the teachers'
savings fund, including picked-up member contributions as described in KRS
161.540(2), plus accrued regular interest;
(15) "Annuitant" means a person who receives a retirement allowance or a disability
allowance;
(16) "Local retirement system" means any teacher retirement or annuity system created
in any public school district in Kentucky in accordance with the laws of Kentucky;
(17) "Fiscal year" means the twelve (12) month period from July 1 to June 30. The
retirement plan year is concurrent with this fiscal year. A contract for a member
employed by a local board of education may not exceed two hundred sixty-one
(261) days in the fiscal year;
(18) "Public schools" means the schools and other institutions mentioned in subsection
(4) of this section;
(19) "Dependent" as used in KRS 161.520 and 161.525 means a person who was
receiving, at the time of death of the member, at least one-half (1/2) of the support
from the member for maintenance, including board, lodging, medical care, and
related costs;
(20) "Active contributing member" means a member currently making contributions to
the Teachers' Retirement System, who made contributions in the next preceding
fiscal year, for whom picked-up member contributions are currently being made, or
for whom these contributions were made in the next preceding fiscal year;
Page 15 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(21) "Full-time" means employment in a position that requires services on a continuing
basis equal to at least seven-tenths (7/10) of normal full-time service on a fiscal
year basis;
(22) "Full actuarial cost," when used to determine the payment that a member must pay
for service credit means the actuarial value of all costs associated with the
enhancement of a member's benefits or eligibility for benefit enhancements,
including health insurance supplement payments made by the retirement system.
The actuary for the retirement system shall determine the full actuarial value costs
and actuarial cost factor tables as provided in KRS 161.400;
(23) "Last annual compensation" means the annual compensation, as defined by
subsection (10) of this section and as limited by subsection (9) of this section,
earned by the member during the most recent period of contributing service, either
consecutive or nonconsecutive, that is sufficient to provide the member with one (1)
full year of service credit in the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, and which
compensation is used in calculating the member's initial retirement allowance,
excluding bonuses, retirement incentives, payments for accumulated sick leave,
annual, personal, and compensatory leave, and any other lump-sum payment. For
an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008, payments for annual
or compensatory leave shall not be included in determining the member's last
annual compensation;
(24) "Participant" means a member, as defined by subsection (4) of this section, or an
annuitant, as defined by subsection (15) of this section;
(25) "Qualified domestic relations order" means any judgment, decree, or order,
including approval of a property settlement agreement, that:
(a) Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and
(b) Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital
property rights to an alternate payee;
Page 16 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(26) "Alternate payee" means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a
participant, who is designated to be paid retirement benefits in a qualified domestic
relations order;
(27) "University member" means an individual who becomes a member through
employment with an employer specified in subsection (4)(b) and (n) of this section;
(28) "Nonuniversity member" means an individual who becomes a member through
employment with an employer specified under subsection (4) of this section, except
for those members employed by an employer specified in subsection (4)(b) and (n)
of this section; and
(29) ["Accumulated employer contribution" means the employer contribution deposited
to a member's account through the supplemental benefit component and regular
interest credited on such amounts as provided by KRS 161.635 for nonuniversity
members and KRS 161.636 for university members;
(30) ]"Accumulated account balance" means[:
(a) For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2022,]
the member's accumulated contributions[; or
(b) For members who began participating in the system on or after January 1,
2022, the combined sum of the member's accumulated contributions and the
member's accumulated employer contributions;
(31) "Foundational benefit component" means the benefits provided by KRS 161.220 to
161.716 to individuals who become members on or after January 1, 2022, except
for the supplemental benefit component and retiree health benefits set forth in KRS
161.675; and
(32) "Supplemental benefit component" means:
(a) The benefit established pursuant to KRS 161.635 for individuals who become
nonuniversity members on or after January 1, 2022; or
(b) The benefit established pursuant to KRS 161.636 for individuals who become
Page 17 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
university members on or after January 1, 2022].
Section 3. KRS 161.540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Each individual who is[becomes] a contributing nonuniversity member [prior
to January 1, 2022, ]shall contribute to the retirement system twelve and eight
hundred fifty-five thousandths percent (12.855%) of annual compensation, of
which:
1. Nine and one hundred five thousandths percent (9.105%) of annual
compensation shall be used to fund pension benefits; and
2. Three and three-quarters percent (3.75%) of annual compensation shall
be used to fund retiree health benefits.
(b) Each individual who is[becomes] a contributing university member [prior to
January 1, 2022, ]shall contribute to the retirement system ten and four-tenths
percent (10.4%) of annual compensation, of which:
1. Seven and six hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (7.625%) of
annual compensation shall be used to fund pension benefits; and
2. Two and seven hundred seventy-five thousandths percent (2.775%) of
annual compensation shall be used to fund retiree health benefits.
(c) [Each individual who becomes a contributing nonuniversity member on or
after January 1, 2022, shall contribute to the retirement system fourteen and
three-quarters percent (14.75%) of annual compensation, of which:
1. Nine percent (9%) of annual compensation shall be used to fund pension
benefits in the foundational benefit component as described by KRS
161.633. The contribution provided by this subparagraph shall not be
used to fund the supplemental benefit account as provided by KRS
161.635;
2. Two percent (2%) of annual compensation shall fund the required
employee contribution in the supplemental benefit component in KRS
Page 18 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
161.635, except that the board may direct these contributions on a
prospective basis into the pension and life insurance funds to contain
costs of the foundational benefit component within the provisions of
KRS 161.633; and
3. Three and three-quarters percent (3.75%) of annual compensation shall
be used to fund retiree health benefits.
(d) Each individual who becomes a contributing university member on or after
January 1, 2022, shall contribute to the retirement system nine and seven
hundred seventy-five thousandths percent (9.775%) of annual compensation,
of which:
1. Five percent (5%) of annual compensation shall be used to fund pension
benefits in the foundational benefit component as described by KRS
161.634. The contribution provided by this subparagraph shall not be
used to fund the supplemental benefit account as provided by KRS
161.636;
2. Two percent (2%) of annual compensation shall fund the required
employee contribution in the supplemental benefit component in KRS
161.636, except that the board may direct these contributions on a
prospective basis into the pension and life insurance funds to contain
costs of the foundational benefit component within the provisions of
KRS 161.634; and
3. Two and seven hundred and seventy-five thousandths percent (2.775%)
of annual compensation shall be used to fund retiree health benefits.
(e) ]When the medical insurance fund established under KRS 161.420(5)
achieves a sufficient prefunded status as determined by the retirement
system's actuary, the board of trustees shall recommend to the General
Assembly that the contributions required under paragraph (a)2. or[,] (b)2.[,
Page 19 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(c)3., or (d)3.] of this subsection shall, in an actuarially accountable manner,
be either decreased, suspended, or eliminated.
(d)[(f)] Payments authorized by statute that are made to retiring members, who
became members of the system before July 1, 2008, for not more than sixty
(60) days of unused accrued annual leave shall, subject to KRS 161.220(10),
be considered as part of the member's annual compensation, and shall be used
only for the member's final year of active service. Notwithstanding the
provisions of this subsection or any other statute to the contrary, for
retirement calculation purposes, members may only be credited for payment
of annual leave under the following conditions:
1. Payment by an employer for annual leave shall be equally available to
all members serving under contracts requiring the same number of
worked days and greater; and
2. At least two (2) members of the employer shall receive payment for
annual leave.
(e)[(g)] The contribution of members shall not exceed the applicable
percentages on annual compensation as set forth in this section or as where
otherwise limited by statute. When a member retires, if it is determined that
he or she has made contributions on a salary in excess of the amount to be
included for the purpose of calculating his or her final average salary, any
excess contribution shall be refunded in a lump sum to the member's
employer for distribution to the member.
(2) Each public board, institution, or agency listed in KRS 161.220(4) shall, solely for
the purpose of compliance with Section 414(h) of the United States Internal
Revenue Code, pick up the member contributions required by this section for all
compensation earned after August 1, 1982, and the contributions so picked up shall
be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under the United
Page 20 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
States Internal Revenue Code and KRS 141.010. The picked-up member
contribution shall satisfy all obligations to the retirement system satisfied prior to
August 1, 1982, by the member contribution, and the picked-up member
contribution shall be in lieu of a member contribution. Each employer shall pay
these picked-up member contributions from the same source of funds which is used
to pay earnings to the member. The member shall have no option to receive the
contributed amounts directly instead of having them paid by the employer to the
system. Member contributions picked-up after August 1, 1982, shall be treated for
all purposes of KRS 161.220 to 161.714 in the same manner and to the same extent
as member contributions made prior to August 1, 1982.
Section 4. KRS 161.550 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each employer, except as provided under KRS 161.555, shall contribute annually to
the Teachers' Retirement System a permanent employer contribution rate on behalf
of each employee it employs equal to:
(a) Thirteen and one hundred five thousandths percent (13.105%) of the total
annual compensation of nonuniversity members who become members prior
to July 1, 2008. Of this permanent employer contribution rate:
1. Twelve and three hundred fifty-five thousandths percent (12.355%) of
the total annual compensation shall be used to fund pension and life
insurance benefits; and
2. Three-quarters of a percent (0.75%) of annual compensation shall be
used to provide funding to the medical insurance fund as provided under
KRS 161.420(5). If the board of trustees establishes a trust fund under
26 U.S.C. sec. 115, the board may deposit the employer contribution
provided in this subparagraph in that trust fund;
(b) Fourteen and one hundred five thousandths percent (14.105%) of the total
annual compensation of nonuniversity members who become members on or
Page 21 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
after July 1, 2008[, but prior to January 1, 2022]. Of this permanent employer
contribution rate:
1. Thirteen and three hundred fifty-five thousandths percent (13.355%) of
the total annual compensation shall be used to fund pension and life
insurance benefits; and
2. Three-quarters of a percent (0.75%) of annual compensation shall be
used to provide funding to the medical insurance fund as provided under
KRS 161.420(5). If the board of trustees establishes a trust fund under
26 U.S.C. sec. 115, the board may deposit the employer contribution
provided in this subparagraph in that trust fund; and
(c) Thirteen and sixty-five hundredths percent (13.65%) of the total annual
compensation of university members[ who become members prior to January
1, 2022]. Of this permanent employer contribution rate:
1. Ten and eight hundred seventy-five thousandths percent (10.875%) of
the total annual compensation shall be used to fund pension and life
insurance benefits; and
2. Two and seven hundred seventy-five thousandths percent (2.775%) of
annual compensation shall be used to provide funding to the medical
insurance fund as provided under KRS 161.420(5). If the board of
trustees establishes a trust fund under 26 U.S.C. sec. 115, the board may
deposit the employer contribution provided in this subparagraph in that
trust fund[;
(d) Ten and three-quarters percent (10.75%) of the total annual compensation of
nonuniversity members who become members on or after January 1, 2022. Of
this permanent employer contribution rate:
1. Eight percent (8%) of the total annual compensation shall be used to
fund pension and life insurance benefits. The contribution provided by
Page 22 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
this subparagraph shall not be used to fund the supplemental benefit
account as provided by KRS 161.635;
2. Two percent (2%) of the total annual compensation shall be used to fund
the mandatory employer contribution of the supplemental benefit
component, except that the board may direct these contributions on a
prospective basis into the pension and life insurance funds to contain
costs within the provisions of KRS 161.633; and
3. Three-quarters of one percent (0.75%) of annual compensation shall be
used to provide funding to the medical insurance fund as provided under
KRS 161.420(5). If the board of trustees establishes a trust fund under
26 U.S.C. sec. 115, the board may deposit the employer contribution
provided in this subdivision in that trust fund; and
(e) Nine and seven hundred seventy-five thousandths percent (9.775%) of total
annual compensation of university members who become members on or after
January 1, 2022. Of this permanent employer contribution rate:
1. Five and seven hundred seventy-five thousandths percent (5.775%) of
the total annual compensation shall be used to fund pension and life
insurance benefits. The contribution provided by this subparagraph shall
not be used to fund the supplemental benefit account as provided by
KRS 161.636;
2. Two percent (2%) of the total annual compensation shall be used to fund
the mandatory employer contribution of the supplemental benefit
component, except that the board may direct these contributions on a
prospective basis into the pension and life insurance funds to contain
costs within the provisions of KRS 161.634; and
3. Two percent (2%) of annual compensation shall be used to provide
funding to the medical insurance fund as provided under KRS
Page 23 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
161.420(5). If the board of trustees establishes a trust fund under 26
U.S.C. sec. 115, the board may deposit the employer contribution
provided in this subparagraph in that trust fund].
(2) In addition to the required contributions in subsection (1) of this section, the state
shall contribute annually to the Teachers' Retirement System a percentage of the
total salaries of the state-funded and federally funded members it employs to pay
the cost of health insurance coverage for retirees who are not eligible for Medicare
and who retire on or after July 1, 2010, less the amounts that are otherwise required
to be paid by the retirees under KRS 161.675. The board shall deposit funds in the
medical insurance fund unless the board of trustees has established a trust fund
under 26 U.S.C. sec. 115 for this purpose. In this case, the board may deposit the
employer contribution in that trust fund. This contribution shall be known as the
state medical insurance fund stabilization contribution. The percentage to be
contributed by the state under this subsection:
(a) Shall be determined by the retirement system's actuary for each biennial
budget period;
(b) May be suspended or adjusted by the General Assembly if in its judgment the
welfare of the Commonwealth so demands; and
(c) Shall not exceed the lesser of the actual benefit cost for retirees not eligible
for Medicare who retire on or after July 1, 2010, or the amount contributed by
employers under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) All employers who employ nonuniversity members shall make a contribution for
each payroll on behalf of their active employees who participate in the Teachers'
Retirement System in an amount equal to three percent (3%) of payroll of those
active employees. The contribution specified by this subsection shall be used to
fund retiree health benefits.
(4) When the medical insurance fund established under KRS 161.420(5) achieves a
Page 24 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
sufficient prefunded status as determined by the Teachers' Retirement System's
actuary, the board of trustees shall recommend to the General Assembly that the
contributions required under subsections (1)(c)2.[ and (e)3.] and (3) of this section
shall, in an actuarially accountable manner, be either decreased, suspended, or
eliminated. The decrease, suspension, or elimination in contributions required
under subsection (1)(c)2. of this section shall not exceed two and twenty-five
thousandths percent (2.025%) of annual compensation.[ The decrease, suspension,
or elimination in contributions required under subsection (1)(e)3. of this section
shall not exceed one and twenty-five hundredths percent (1.25%) of annual
compensation.]
(5) Each employer shall remit the required employer contributions to the retirement
system under the terms and conditions specified for member contributions under
KRS 161.560. The state shall provide annual appropriations based upon estimated
funds needed to meet the requirements of KRS 161.155, 161.168, 161.507(4),
161.515, 161.545, 161.553, 161.605, 161.612, and 161.620(1), (3), (5), (6), and (7).
In the event an annual appropriation is less than the amount of these requirements,
the state shall make up the deficit in the next biennium budget appropriation to the
retirement system. Employer contributions to the retirement system are for the
exclusive purpose of providing benefits to members and annuitants and these
contributions shall be considered deferred compensation to the members.[ This
subsection shall not apply to costs applicable to individuals who become members
on or after January 1, 2022.]
Section 5. KRS 161.600 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [An individual who becomes ]A member of the retirement system [prior to January
1, 2022, ]may qualify for service retirement by meeting one (1) of the following
requirements:
(a) Attainment of age sixty (60) years and completion of five (5) years of
Page 25 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
Kentucky service;
(b) 1. For an individual who becomes a member before July 1, 2008,
attainment of age fifty-five (55) years and completion of a minimum of
five (5) years of Kentucky service with an actuarial reduction of the
basic allowance of five percent (5%) for each year the member's age is
less than sixty (60) years or for each year the member's years of
Kentucky service credit is less than twenty-seven (27), whichever is the
lesser number; and
2. For an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008,
attainment of age fifty-five (55) years and completion of a minimum of
ten (10) years of Kentucky service with an actuarial reduction of the
basic retirement allowance of six percent (6%) for each year the
member's age is less than sixty (60) years or for each year the member's
years of Kentucky service credit is less than twenty-seven (27),
whichever is the lesser number;
(c) Completion of twenty-seven (27) years of Kentucky service. Out-of-state
service earned in accordance with the provisions of KRS 161.515(2) may be
used to meet this requirement; or
(d) Completion of the necessary years of service under provisions of KRS
61.559(2)(c) if the member is retiring under the reciprocity provisions of KRS
61.680. A member retiring under this paragraph who has not attained age
fifty-five (55) shall incur an actuarial reduction of the basic allowance
determined by the system's actuary for each year the member's service credit
is less than twenty-seven (27).
(2) [An individual who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after January
1, 2022, shall, except as adjusted by the board pursuant to KRS 161.633 or 161.634,
as applicable, be eligible to retire upon attainment of:
Page 26 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(a) Age sixty-five (65) and completion of a minimum of five (5) years of Kentucky
service;
(b) Age sixty (60) and completion of a minimum of ten (10) years of Kentucky service;
(c) Age fifty-seven (57) and completion of a minimum of thirty (30) years of Kentucky
service; or
(d) Age fifty-seven (57) and completion of a minimum of ten (10) years of Kentucky
service with an actuarial reduction of the basic retirement allowance of six percent
(6%) for each year the member's age is less than sixty (60) years or for each year
the member's years of Kentucky service credit is less than thirty (30), whichever is
the lesser number.
(3) ]Any person who has been a member in Kentucky for twenty-seven (27) years or
more and who withdraws from covered employment may continue to pay into the
fund each year until the end of the fiscal year in which he or she reaches the age of
sixty-five (65) years, the current contribution rate based on the annual
compensation received during the member's last full year in covered employment,
less any payment received for accrued sick leave or accrued leave from an
employer. The member shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance as
provided in KRS 161.620 at any time after withdrawing from covered employment
and payment of contributions under this subsection. No member shall make
contributions as provided for in this subsection if the member is at the same time
making contributions to another retirement system in Kentucky supported wholly or
in part by public funds.
(3)[(4)] Service credit in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the State
Police Retirement System, the Legislators' Retirement Plan, the County Employees
Retirement System, or the Judicial Retirement System may be used in meeting the
service requirements of subsection[subsections] (1)(a) to (c)[ and (2)] of this
section, provided the service is subsequent to July 1, 1956.
Page 27 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(4)[(5)] Upon death, disability, or service retirement, a member's accounts under all
state supported retirement systems shall be consolidated, as provided by this section
and by KRS 61.680, for the purpose of determining eligibility and amount of
benefits, which shall include medical benefits. Upon determination of benefits, each
system shall pay the applicable percentage of total benefits. The effective date of
retirement under this subsection shall be determined by each retirement system for
the portion of the payments that will be made.
(5)[(6)] No retirement annuity shall be effective until written application and option
election forms are filed with the retirement office in accordance with administrative
regulations of the board of trustees. A member may withdraw his or her retirement
application, postpone his or her effective retirement date, or change his or her
retirement option if these elections are made no later than the fifteenth day of the
month in which the member has made application for retirement.
(6)[(7)] The surviving spouse of an active contributing member, if named as
beneficiary of the member's account, may purchase retirement credit that the
member was eligible to purchase prior to the member's death.
Section 6. KRS 161.620 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The retirement allowance, in the form of a life annuity with refundable balance, of a
member retiring for service shall be calculated as follows:
(a) For retirements effective July 1, 1998, and thereafter, except as otherwise
provided by this section, the annual allowance for each year of service shall
be two percent (2%) of the final average salary for service performed prior to
July 1, 1983, and two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the final average salary
for service performed after July 1, 1983, for all nonuniversity members.
Except as otherwise provided by this section, the annual retirement allowance
for each year of service performed by members of the Teachers' Retirement
System who are university members shall be two percent (2%) of the final
Page 28 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
average salary. Actuarial discounts due to age or service credit at retirement
may be applied as provided in this section;
(b) For individuals who become nonuniversity members of the Teachers'
Retirement System on or after July 1, 2002, and before July 1, 2008, who
upon retirement have earned less than ten (10) full years of service credit, the
retirement allowance shall be two percent (2%) of the member's final average
salary for each year of service. For individuals who become nonuniversity
members of the Teachers' Retirement System on or after July 1, 2002, and
before July 1, 2008, and who upon retirement have earned at least ten (10) full
years of service credit, the annual allowance for each year of service shall be
two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the member's final average salary;
(c) The board of trustees may approve for members who initially retire on or after
July 1, 2004, and who become nonuniversity members before July 1, 2008, a
retirement allowance of three percent (3%) of the member's final average
salary for each year or partial year of service credit earned in excess of thirty
(30) years. This three percent (3%) factor shall be in lieu of the two and one-
half percent (2.5%) factor provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection for
every year or fraction of a year of service in excess of thirty (30) years. Upon
approval of this three percent (3%) retirement factor, the board of trustees
may establish conditions of eligibility regarding the type of service credit that
will qualify for meeting the requirements of this subsection. This subsection is
optional with the board of trustees and shall not be subject to KRS 161.714;
(d) For individuals who become nonuniversity members of the Teachers'
Retirement System on or after July 1, 2008[, but prior to January 1, 2022], the
retirement allowance shall be:
1. a. One and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the member's final
average salary for each year of service if the member has earned
Page 29 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
ten (10) or less years of service at retirement;
b. Two percent (2%) of the member's final average salary for each
year of service if the member has earned greater than ten (10) but
no more than twenty (20) years of service at retirement;
c. Two and three-tenths percent (2.3%) of the member's final average
salary for each year of service if the member has earned greater
than twenty (20) but no more than twenty-six (26) years of service
at retirement; or
d. Two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the member's final average
salary for each year of service if the member has earned greater
than twenty-six (26) but no more than thirty (30) years of service
at retirement; and
2. Three percent (3%) of the member's final average salary for each year or
partial year of service earned in excess of thirty (30) years of service at
retirement subject to the same terms and conditions as set forth in
paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(e) For individuals who become university members of the Teachers' Retirement
System on or after July 1, 2008[, but prior to January 1, 2022], the retirement
allowance shall be:
1. One and one-half percent (1.5%) of the member's final average salary
for each year of service if the member has earned ten (10) or less years
of service at retirement;
2. One and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the member's final average
salary for each year of service if the member has earned greater than ten
(10) but no more than twenty (20) years of service at retirement;
3. One and eighty-five hundredths percent (1.85%) of the member's final
average salary for each year of service if the member has earned greater
Page 30 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
than twenty (20) but less than twenty-seven (27) years of service at
retirement; or
4. Two percent (2%) of the member's final average salary for each year of
service if the member has earned twenty-seven (27) or more years of
service at retirement; and
(f) [For individuals who become nonuniversity members of the Teachers'
Retirement System on or after January 1, 2022, the retirement allowance shall,
except as adjusted by the board pursuant to KRS 161.633, be the following
percentage of the member's final average salary for each year of service:
1. One and seven-tenths percent (1.7%), which shall be increased
incrementally each month the member's age at retirement is greater than
sixty (60) so that the incremental increase is four one-hundredths of one
percent (0.04%) for each complete additional year of age at retirement in
excess of sixty (60), not to exceed a value of one and nine-tenths percent
(1.9%) at age sixty-five (65) or greater; plus
2. a. One-quarter of one percent (0.25%), if the member has earned at
least twenty (20) but less than thirty (30) years of service at
retirement; or
b. One-half of one percent (0.50%), if the member has earned thirty
(30) or more years of service at retirement;
(g) For individuals who become university members of the Teachers' Retirement
System on or after January 1, 2022, the retirement allowance shall, except as
adjusted by the board pursuant to KRS 161.634, be the following percentage
of the member's final average salary for each year of service:
1. Seven-tenths of one percent (0.7%), which shall be increased
incrementally each month the member's age at retirement is greater than
sixty (60) so that the incremental increase is four one-hundredths of one
Page 31 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
percent (0.04%) for each complete additional year of age in excess of
sixty (60), not to exceed a value of nine-tenths of one percent (0.9%) at
age sixty-five (65) or greater; plus
2. a. One-quarter of one percent (0.25%), if the member has earned at
least twenty (20) but less than thirty (30) years of service at
retirement; or
b. One-half of one percent (0.50%), if the member has earned thirty
(30) or more years of service at retirement; and
(h) ]The retirement allowance of a member at retirement, as measured on a life
annuity, shall not exceed the member's last yearly salary or the member's final
average salary, whichever is the greater amount. For purposes of this section,
"yearly salary" means the compensation earned by a member during the most
recent period of contributing service, either consecutive or nonconsecutive,
preceding the member's effective retirement date and shall be subject to the
provisions of KRS 161.220(9) and (10)[. This paragraph shall not apply to the
supplemental benefit component].
(2) Effective July 1, 2002, and annually on July 1 thereafter, the retirement allowance
of each retired member and of each beneficiary of a retirement option shall be
increased in the amount of one and one-half percent (1.5%), provided the retired
member had been retired for at least the full twelve (12) months immediately
preceding the date that the increase is effective. In the event that the retired member
had been retired for less than the full twelve (12) months immediately preceding the
date that the increase is effective, then the increase shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis by each month that the retired member had not been retired for the full twelve
(12) months immediately preceding the effective date of the increase[. This
subsection shall not apply to benefits from the supplemental benefit component, and
the board may adjust this value for individuals who become members on or after
Page 32 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
January 1, 2022, as provided by KRS 161.633 or 161.634, as applicable].
(3) Any member qualifying for retirement under a life annuity with refundable balance
shall be entitled to receive an annual allowance amounting to not less than four
hundred dollars ($400) effective July 1, 2002, and not less than four hundred forty
dollars ($440) effective July 1, 2003, multiplied by the service credit years of the
member. These minimums shall apply to the retired members receiving annuity
payments and to those members retiring on or subsequent to the effective dates
listed in this subsection, except the following:
(a) Individuals who become members of the Teachers' Retirement System on or
after July 1, 2008; or
(b) Members whose retirement allowance payment is reduced below the
minimum allowance as a result of its division in a qualified domestic relations
order or any other provision permitted under KRS 161.700.
(4) The minimum retirement allowance provided in this section shall apply in the case
of members retired or retiring under an option other than a life annuity with
refundable balance in the same proportion to the benefits of the member and his or
her beneficiary or beneficiaries as provided in the duly-adopted option tables at the
time of the member's retirement.
(5) Effective July 1, 2008, the monthly allowance of each retired member and each
recipient of a retirement option of the retired member may be increased in an
amount not to exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the monthly allowance
in effect the previous month, provided the retired member had been retired for at
least the full twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date that the increase is
effective. In the event that the retired member had been retired for less than the full
twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date that the increase is effective,
then the increase shall be reduced on a pro rata basis by each month that the retired
member had not been retired for the full twelve (12) months immediately preceding
Page 33 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
the effective date of the increase. The level of increase provided for in this
subsection shall be determined by the funding provided in the 2008-2010 biennium
budget appropriation.
(6) Effective July 1, 2009, the monthly allowance of each retired member and each
recipient of a retirement option of the retired member may be increased in an
amount not to exceed seven-tenths of one percent (0.7%) of the monthly allowance
in effect the previous month, provided the retired member had been retired for at
least the full twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date that the increase is
effective. In the event that the retired member had been retired for less than the full
twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date that the increase is effective,
then the increase shall be reduced on a pro rata basis by each month that the retired
member had not been retired for the full twelve (12) months immediately preceding
the effective date of the increase. The level of increase provided for in this
subsection shall be determined by the funding provided in the 2008-2010 biennium
budget appropriation.
(7) Effective July 1, 1990, monthly payments of two hundred dollars ($200) shall be
payable for the benefit of an adult child of a member retired for service when the
child's mental or physical condition is sufficient to cause dependency on the
member at the time of retirement. Eligibility for this payment shall continue for the
life of the child or until the time the mental or physical condition creating the
dependency no longer exists or the child marries. Benefits under this subsection
shall apply to legally adopted survivors provided the proceedings for the adoption
were initiated at least one (1) year prior to the death of the member. The board of
trustees shall be the sole judge of eligibility or dependency and may require formal
application or information relating thereto.
(8) Members of the Teachers' Retirement System shall be subject to the annuity income
limitations imposed by Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Service Code.
Page 34 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(9) Compensation in excess of the limitations imposed by Section 401(a)(17) of the
Internal Revenue Code shall not be used in determining a member's retirement
annuity. The limitation on compensation for eligible members shall not be less than
the amount which was allowed to be taken into account by the retirement system in
effect on July 1, 1993. For this purpose, an eligible member is an individual who
was a member of the retirement system before the first plan year beginning after
December 31, 1995.
Section 7. KRS 161.655 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2000, the Teachers' Retirement System shall:
(a) Provide a life insurance benefit in a minimum amount of five thousand dollars
($5,000) for its members who are retired for service or disability[, except that
the minimum amount for an individual who becomes a member on or after
January 1, 2022, and retires for service or disability shall be ten thousand
dollars ($10,000)]. This life insurance benefit shall be payable upon the death
of a member retired for service or disability to the member's estate or to a
party designated by the member on a form prescribed by the retirement
system; and
(b) Provide a life insurance benefit in a minimum amount of two thousand dollars
($2,000) for its active contributing members[, except that the minimum
amount for an individual who becomes a member on or after January 1, 2022,
and is an active contributing member shall be five thousand dollars ($5,000)].
This life insurance benefit shall be payable upon the death of an active
contributing member to the member's estate or to a party designated by the
member on a form prescribed by the retirement system.
(2) (a) The member may name one (1) primary and one (1) contingent beneficiary for
receipt of the life insurance benefit. To the extent permitted by the Internal
Revenue Code, a trust may be designated as beneficiary for receipt of the life
Page 35 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
insurance benefit.
(b) Members may designate as beneficiaries only presently identifiable and
existing individuals, or trusts where otherwise permitted, without contingency
instructions, on forms prescribed by the retirement system.
(c) In the event that a member fails to designate a beneficiary, or all designated
beneficiaries predecease the member, the member's estate shall be deemed to
be the beneficiary, unless the member is married at the time of his or her
death, in which case the spouse shall be deemed the beneficiary.
(d) 1. Any beneficiary designation made by the member, including the estate
should the estate become the beneficiary by default, shall remain in
effect until changed by the member on forms prescribed by the
retirement system, except in the event of subsequent marriage or
divorce.
2. A valid marriage license shall terminate any previously designated
beneficiary, even that of a trust, and establish the spouse as beneficiary
unless, subsequent proof of the marriage, the member or retired member
redesignates someone other than the new spouse as the beneficiary.
3. An individual who is married prior to becoming an active member or a
retired member of the retirement system and remains married at the time
of becoming an active or retired member of the retirement system shall
have his or her spouse considered the primary beneficiary, unless the
member designates another beneficiary.
4. A final divorce decree shall terminate the beneficiary status of an ex-
spouse unless, subsequent to divorce, the member redesignates the
former spouse as a beneficiary. A final divorce decree shall not
terminate the designation of a trust as beneficiary regardless of who is
designated as beneficiary of the trust.
Page 36 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(e) The Teachers' Retirement System shall not acknowledge a beneficiary
designation unless the life insurance beneficiary form is received by the
Teachers' Retirement System prior to the member's death, or the life insurance
beneficiary form has been deposited in the mail with a postmark date no later
than the date of the member's death.
(3) Application for payment of life insurance proceeds shall be made to the Teachers'
Retirement System together with acceptable evidence of death and eligibility. The
reciprocal provisions of KRS 61.680(2)(a) shall not apply to the coverage and
payment of proceeds by the life insurance benefit under this section.
(4) Suit or civil action shall not be required for the collection of the proceeds of the life
insurance benefit provided for by this section, but nothing in this section shall
prevent the maintenance of suit or civil action against the beneficiary or legal
representative receiving the proceeds of the life insurance benefit.
(5) Upon the death of a member of the Teachers' Retirement System, the life insurance
provided pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may be assigned by the
designated beneficiary to a bank or licensed funeral home.
Section 8. KRS 161.400 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The board of trustees shall designate as actuary a competent person who shall
be a fellow of the Conference of Consulting Actuaries or a member of the
American Academy of Actuaries. He or she shall be the technical adviser of
the board on matters regarding the operation of the funds of the system and
shall perform such other duties as are required in connection therewith.
(b) 1. At least once in each two (2) year period, the board shall cause an
actuarial investigation to be made of all of the economic experience
under the retirement system, including but not limited to the inflation
rate, investment return, and payroll growth assumptions, relative to the
economic assumptions and funding methods previously adopted by the
Page 37 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
board.
2. At least once in each five (5) year period, the actuary shall make an
actuarial investigation into all of the demographic actuarial assumptions
used, including but not limited to mortality tables, withdrawal rates, and
retirement rate assumptions, relative to the demographic actuarial
assumptions previously adopted by the board.
3. Each actuarial investigation shall include at a minimum a summary of
the changes in actuarial assumptions and funding methods
recommended in the investigation and the projected impact of the
recommended changes on funding levels, unfunded liabilities, and
actuarially recommended contribution rates for employers over a thirty
(30) year period.
(c) At least annually the actuary shall make an actuarial valuation of the
retirement system. The valuation shall include:
1. A description of the actuarial assumptions used, and the assumptions
shall be reasonably related to the experience of the system and represent
the actuary's best estimate of anticipated experience;
2. A description of any funding methods utilized or required by state law in
the development of the actuarial valuation results;
3. A description of any changes in actuarial assumptions and methods from
the previous year's actuarial valuation;
4. The actuarially recommended contribution rate for employers for the
upcoming budget periods;
5. A thirty (30) year projection of the funding levels, unfunded liabilities,
and actuarially recommended contribution rates for employers based
upon the actuarial assumptions, funding methods, and experience of the
system as of the valuation date; and
Page 38 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
6. A sensitivity analysis that evaluates the impact of changes in system
assumptions, including but not limited to the investment return
assumption, payroll growth assumption, and medical inflation rates, on
employer contribution rates, funding levels, and unfunded liabilities.
(d) On the basis of the results of the valuations, the board of trustees shall make
necessary changes in the retirement system within the provisions of law and
shall establish the contributions payable by employers and the state specified
in KRS 161.550[, including changes prescribed by KRS 161.633, 161.634,
161.635, and 161.636, as applicable].
(e) For any change in actuarial assumptions, funding methods, retiree health
insurance premiums and subsidies, or any other decisions made by the board
that impact system liabilities and actuarially recommended contribution rates
for employers and that are not made in conjunction with the actuarial
investigations required by paragraph (b) of this subsection, an actuarial
analysis shall be completed showing the projected impact of the changes on
funding levels, unfunded liabilities, and actuarially recommended contribution
rates for employers over a thirty (30) year period.
(2) Actuarial factors and actuarial cost factor tables in use by the retirement system for
all purposes shall be determined by the actuary of the retirement system and
approved by the board of trustees by resolution and implemented without the
necessity of an administrative regulation.
(3) A copy of each actuarial investigation, actuarial analysis, and valuation required by
subsection (1) of this section shall be forwarded electronically to the Legislative
Research Commission no later than ten (10) days after receipt by the board, and the
Legislative Research Commission shall distribute the information received to the
committee staff and co-chairs of any committee that has jurisdiction over the
Teachers' Retirement System. The actuarial valuation required by subsection (1)(c)
Page 39 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
of this section shall be submitted no later than November 15 following the close of
the fiscal year.
Section 9. KRS 161.420 is amended to read as follows:
All of the assets of the retirement system are for the exclusive purpose of providing
benefits to members and annuitants and defraying reasonable expenses of administering
the system. The board of trustees shall be the trustee of all funds of the system and shall
have full power and responsibility for administering the funds. All the assets of the
retirement system shall be credited according to the purpose for which they are held to
one (1) of the following funds:
(1) The expense fund shall consist of the funds set aside from year to year by the board
of trustees to defray the expenses of the administration of the retirement system.
Each fiscal year an amount not greater than four percent (4%) of the dividends and
interest income earned from investments during the immediate past fiscal year shall
be set aside into the expense fund or expended for the administration of the
retirement system;
(2) (a) The teachers' savings fund shall consist of [:
1. ]the contributions paid by members of the retirement system into this
fund and regular interest assigned by the board of trustees from the
guarantee fund[; and
2. For individuals who become members of the Teachers' Retirement
System on or after January 1, 2022, who are participating in the
supplemental benefit component, the employer contributions paid into
the supplemental benefit component and regular interest on those
contributions as provided by KRS 161.635 and 161.636 that is assigned
by the board of trustees from the guarantee fund.
For individuals who become members on or after January 1, 2022, the system
shall account for funds in the teachers' savings fund attributable to the
Page 40 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
nonuniversity members foundational benefit component, nonuniversity
members supplemental benefit component, university members foundational
benefit component, and university members supplemental benefit
component].
(b) A member may not borrow any amount of his or her accumulated account
balance in the teachers' savings fund, or any regular interest earned thereon.
(c) The accumulated contributions or accumulated account balance of a member
which are returned to him or her upon his or her withdrawal or paid to his or
her estate or designated beneficiary in the event of his or her death shall be
paid from the teachers' savings fund.
(d) Any accumulated account balance in the teachers' savings fund forfeited by a
failure of a teacher or his or her estate to claim these contributions shall be
transferred from this fund to the guarantee fund.
(e) [Except as provided by paragraph (f) of this subsection, ]The accumulated
account balance of a member in the teachers' savings fund shall be transferred
from this fund to the allowance reserve fund in the event of retirement by
reason of service or disability[.
(f) For an individual who becomes a member of the Teachers' Retirement System
on or after January 1, 2022, who is participating in the supplemental benefit
component who elects to annuitize his or her accumulated account balance in
the supplemental benefit component as prescribed by KRS 161.635(5)(a) or
(b) or 161.636(5)(a) or (b), the member's accumulated account balance in the
supplemental benefit component shall be transferred from this fund to the
allowance reserve fund];
(3) The state accumulation fund shall consist of funds paid by employers and
appropriated by the state for the purpose of providing annuities and survivor
benefits, including any sums appropriated for meeting unfunded liabilities, together
Page 41 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
with regular interest assigned by the board of trustees from the guarantee fund. At
the time of retirement or death of a member there shall be transferred from the state
accumulation fund to the allowance reserve fund an amount which together with the
sum transferred from the teachers' savings fund will be sufficient to provide the
member a retirement allowance and provide for benefits under KRS 161.520 and
161.525[. There shall also be transferred from the state accumulation fund to the
teachers' savings fund, the amount needed to fund the mandatory employer
contributions required by KRS 161.635 and 161.636];
(4) The allowance reserve fund shall be the fund from which shall be paid all
retirement allowances and benefits provided under KRS 161.520 and 161.525. In
addition, whenever a change in the status of a member results in an obligation on
this fund, there shall be transferred to this fund from the teachers' savings fund and
the state accumulation fund, the amounts as may be held in those funds for the
account or benefit of the member;
(5) (a) The medical insurance fund, which is an account established according to 26
U.S.C. sec. 401(h), shall consist of amounts accumulated for the purpose of
providing benefits as provided in KRS 161.675, including:
1. The member contributions required by KRS 161.540(1)(a)2. and[,]
(b)2.[, (c)3., and (d)3.];
2. The employer contribution required by KRS 161.550(1)(a)2., (b)2.,
(c)2., [(d)3., and (e)3. ]and (3);
3. State appropriations as set forth in KRS 161.550(2), unless the
contributions are made to a trust fund under 26 U.S.C. sec. 115
established by the board for this purpose; and
4. Interest income from the investments of the fund from contributions
received by the fund under subparagraphs 1. to 3. of this paragraph, and
from income earned on those investments.
Page 42 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(b) All claims for benefits under KRS 161.675 shall be paid from this fund or
from any trust fund under 26 U.S.C. sec. 115 as established by the board for
this purpose. Any amounts deposited to the fund that are not required to meet
current costs shall be maintained as a reserve in the fund for these benefits.
The board shall take the necessary and appropriate steps, including
promulgating administrative regulations and procedures to maintain the status
of the medical insurance fund as an account subject to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h);
(6) The guarantee fund shall be maintained to facilitate the crediting of uniform interest
on the amounts of the other funds, except the expense fund, to finance operating
expenses directly related to investment management services, and to provide a
contingent fund out of which special requirements of any of the other funds may be
covered. All income, interest, and dividends derived from the authorized deposits
and investments shall be paid into the guarantee fund. Any funds received from
gifts and bequests, which the board is hereby authorized to accept and expend
without limitation in a manner either expressed by the donor or deemed to be in the
best interest of the membership, shall be credited to the guarantee fund. Any funds
transferred from the teachers' savings fund by reason of lack of claimant or because
of a surplus in any fund and any other moneys whose disposition is not otherwise
provided for, shall also be credited to the guarantee fund. The interest allowed by
the board of trustees to each of the other funds shall be paid to these funds from the
guarantee fund. Any deficit occurring in any fund that would not be automatically
covered shall be met by the payments from the guarantee fund to that fund;
(7) The school employee annuity fund shall consist of those funds voluntarily
contributed under the provisions of Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code by
a member of the Teachers' Retirement System with accounts that existed on or after
July 1, 1996. The contributions shall not be picked up as provided in KRS
161.540(2). Separate member accounts shall be maintained for each member. The
Page 43 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
board of trustees may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS
Chapter 13A to manage this program;
(8) The supplemental retirement benefit fund shall consist of those funds contributed
by the employer for the purpose of constituting a qualified government excess
benefit plan as described in Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code for accounts
that existed on or after July 1, 1996. The board of trustees shall promulgate
administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to administer this
program; and
(9) The life insurance benefit fund shall consist of amounts accumulated for the
purpose of providing benefits provided under KRS 161.655. The board of trustees
may allocate to this fund a percentage of the employer and state contributions as
provided under KRS 161.550. The allocation to this fund will be in an amount that
the actuary determines necessary to fund the obligation of providing the benefits
provided under KRS 161.655[; and
(10) The stabilization reserve account shall consist of amounts in two (2) separate
accounts:
(a) One (1) that includes employer contributions as provided by KRS 161.550(1)(d)1.
and 2. that exceeds the combined actuarially required employer contribution for the
foundational benefit component and the mandatory employer contribution to the
supplemental benefit component as provided by KRS 161.633 and 161.635 for
those individuals who become nonuniversity members on or after January 1, 2022;
and
(b) One (1) that includes employer contributions as provided by KRS 161.550(1)(e)1.
and 2. that exceeds the combined actuarially required employer contribution for the
foundational benefit component and the mandatory employer contribution to the
supplemental benefit component as provided by KRS 161.634 and 161.636 for
those individuals who become university members on or after January 1, 2022.
Page 44 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, funds in these accounts shall only
be used to pay off the unfunded liability of the pension and life insurance funds].
Section 10. KRS 161.470 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The membership of the retirement system shall consist of all new members, all
present teachers, and all persons participating under the retirement system as of
June 30, 1986, except as provided in Acts 1938 (1st Ex. Sess.), Ch. 1, paragraph 29.
The board of trustees of the Teachers' Retirement System shall be responsible for
final determination of membership eligibility and may direct employers to take
whatever action that may be necessary to correct any error relating to membership.
(2) Service credit shall be forfeited upon withdrawal. If a member again enters service
it shall be as a new member, except that any teacher who withdraws by claiming his
or her deposits may repay the system the amount withdrawn plus interest and
reestablish his or her service credit as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Effective July 1, 1988, and thereafter, an active contributing member of the
retirement system with contributing service equal to one (1) year may regain service
credit by depositing in the teachers' savings fund the amount withdrawn with
interest at the rate to be set by the board of trustees, and computed from the first of
the month of withdrawal and including the month of redeposit.
(4) Effective July 1, 1974, any active contributing member with at least two (2) years
of contributing service credit who declined membership as provided in Acts 1938
(1st Ex. Sess.), Ch. 1, paragraph 29, may secure service credit for prior service, and
for any subsequent service prior to date of membership, by depositing in the
teachers' savings fund contributions for each year of subsequent service prior to
date of membership, with interest at the rate of eight percent (8%) compounded
annually to the date of deposit.
(5) Membership in the retirement system shall be terminated:
(a) By retirement for service;
Page 45 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(b) By death;
(c) By withdrawal of the member's accumulated account balance;
(d) When a member, having less than five (5) years of Kentucky service is absent
from service for more than three (3) consecutive years; or
(e) For persons whose membership begins on or after August 1, 2000, when a
member is convicted, in any state or federal court of competent jurisdiction, of
a felony related to his or her employment as provided in subparagraphs 1. and
2. of this paragraph.
1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person whose
membership begins on or after August 1, 2000, who is convicted, in any
state or federal court of competent jurisdiction, of a felony related to his
or her employment shall forfeit rights and benefits earned under the
retirement system, except for the return of his or her accumulated
contributions and interest credited on those contributions.
2. The payment of retirement benefits ordered forfeited shall be stayed
pending any appeal of the conviction. If the conviction is reversed on
final judgment, no retirement benefits shall be forfeited.
Except for paragraph (e) of this subsection, upon termination of member accounts
under this subsection, funds in the account shall be transferred to the guarantee
fund. Inactive members may apply for refunds of these funds at any time. The
terminated service shall be reinstated, if not withdrawn by the member, in the event
that the member returns to active contributing service.
(6) In case of withdrawal from service prior to eligibility for retirement, the board of
trustees shall on request of the member return all of his or her accumulated account
balance, including any payments made by the member to the state accumulation
fund, but the member shall have no claim on any contributions made by the state or
employer with a view to his or her retirement[, except as provided by KRS 161.635
Page 46 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
and 161.636,] or to contributions made to the medical insurance fund. A member
who is withdrawing from service prior to retirement eligibility shall be entitled to a
refund following sixty (60) days after his or her last day of employment. If the
member is eligible for an immediate service retirement allowance as provided in
KRS 161.600, no withdrawal and refund shall be permitted, unless the allowance
would prohibit the member from qualifying for Social Security benefits or the
member elects to withdraw part or all of his or her service for the purpose of
obtaining service credit in another retirement plan. Requests for refund of
contributions by the member must be filed on forms prescribed by the Teachers'
Retirement System and the employer shall be financially responsible for all
information that is certified on the prescribed form. A member may not withdraw
any part of his or her accumulated account balance in the retirement system except
as provided by this subsection.
(7) Except as provided in KRS 161.520 and 161.525, in case of death prior to
retirement, the board of trustees shall pay to the estate of the deceased member,
unless a beneficiary was otherwise applicably designated by the deceased member,
then to the beneficiary, all of his or her accumulated account balance, including any
payments made by the member to the state accumulation fund, but the estate or
beneficiary shall have no claim on any contributions made by the state or employer
with a view to the retirement of the member[, except as provided by KRS 161.635
and 161.636,] or to contributions made to the medical insurance fund.
(8) Any active contributing member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System,
the County Employees Retirement System, the State Police Retirement System, or
the Judicial Retirement System may use service, under that retirement system for
the purpose of meeting the service requirement of subsections (3) and (4) of this
section.
Section 11. KRS 161.507 is amended to read as follows:
Page 47 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(1) An active contributing member of the Teachers' Retirement System may receive
service credit for active service rendered in the uniformed services of the Armed
Forces of the United States, including the commissioned corps of the Public Health
Service, subject to the provisions of the Uniformed Services Employment and
Reemployment Rights Act of 1994 and the administrative regulations promulgated
by the board of trustees. Military service includes service in the uniformed services
that occurs before the employment of a member in a position covered by the
retirement system or where a member leaves covered employment without giving
advance written or verbal notice of performing duty in the uniformed services.
Service in the uniformed services also includes uniformed service that occurs after
employment in a position covered by the retirement system where the member has
given advance written or verbal notice of performing duty in the uniformed services
and the member returns directly from uniformed services to covered employment.
Military service may be credited only if discharge was honorable or was not
terminated upon the occurrence of any of the events listed in 38 U.S.C. sec. 4304.
Service shall be considered as Kentucky teaching service, except that service may
not be used for meeting the service requirements set forth in KRS 161.600(1)(a)[ or
(2)] or 161.661(1) unless the service occurred after the member gave written or
verbal notice of performing duty in the uniformed services and the member returned
directly from uniformed services to covered employment. A maximum of six (6)
years of military service may be credited, but in no case a greater number of years
than the actual years of contributing service in Kentucky.
(2) No credit shall be granted for military service which has been or will be used in
qualifying for annuity benefit payments from another retirement system financed
wholly or in part by public funds.
(3) A member having twenty (20) years or more of active duty in the military service,
and who is qualified for regular federal retirement benefits based on this military
Page 48 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
service, may not receive credit for any military service in the Teachers' Retirement
System. This subsection shall apply to service presented for credit on July 1, 1975,
and after this date.
(4) (a) A member receiving retirement credit for active duty in the armed services of
the United States prior to employment in a position covered by the retirement
system or where the member leaves covered employment without giving
advance written or verbal notice of performing duty in the uniformed services
shall pay to the retirement system the full actuarial cost of the service credit
purchased as provided under KRS 161.220(22). These contributions shall not
be picked up, as described in KRS 161.540(2). In purchasing retirement credit
for active duty in the armed services, the latest years of service shall be
considered first in allowing credit toward retirement. The board of trustees
shall adopt a table of actuarial factors to be used in calculating the amount of
contribution required for crediting this service.
(b) If military service occurred after the member gave written or verbal notice of
performing duty in the uniformed services and the member returns directly
from uniformed services to covered employment, the member shall contribute
the regular member contribution required by KRS 161.540. The member may
make the payment of delayed contributions in a lump sum payment or in
installments not to exceed five (5) years beginning with the member's date of
reemployment. Interest at the rate of eight percent (8%) per annum shall be
charged for delayed contributions beginning with the member's date of
reemployment until paid[. Members participating in the supplemental benefit
component who make the regular member contribution required by this
paragraph, shall also receive the mandatory employer contributions in the
supplemental benefit component for the period of service purchased].
(5) An active contributing member of the Teachers' Retirement System may receive
Page 49 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
service credit for service in the military reserves of the United States or the National
Guard. The member may purchase one (1) month of service for each six (6) months
of service in the reserves or the National Guard. Notwithstanding any other statute,
regulation, or policy to the contrary, the system shall provide a member, upon
request, the estimated actuarial cost of the National Guard or military reserves
service purchase based upon the information available at the time of the request.
The member shall be entitled to enter into a contract with the system at the time of
the request to purchase the National Guard or military reserve service by paying to
the system the estimated actuarial cost, either by installments or in lump sum. The
member shall pay the full actuarial cost of this service in the military reserves or the
National Guard as provided in KRS 161.220(22). Service in the military reserves or
the National Guard shall be treated as service earned prior to participation in the
system and shall not be used for meeting the service requirements set forth in KRS
161.600(1)(a)[ or (2)] or 161.661(1). The payment shall not be picked up by the
employer, as described in KRS 161.540(2).
Section 12. KRS 161.520 is amended to read as follows:
Upon the death of an active contributing member or upon the death of a member retired
for disability, except as provided in KRS 161.661(6), the survivors of the deceased
member in the following named order, may elect to receive a survivor's benefit payable
as follows:
(1) Where there is a surviving widow or widower who is named as the primary
beneficiary of the member's retirement account, the benefit shall be:
(a) One hundred eighty dollars ($180) per month with no restriction on other
income;
(b) Two hundred forty dollars ($240) per month when the surviving widow or
widower's total income from all sources does not exceed six thousand six
hundred dollars ($6,600) per year or five hundred fifty dollars ($550) per
Page 50 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
month; or
(c) If the deceased member has a minimum of ten (10) years of service credit
with the Teachers' Retirement System, the surviving widow or widower may
apply for an annuity actuarially equivalent to the annuity that would have
been paid to the deceased member when eligibility conditions were met.
Eligibility for payments would begin at the time the age of the deceased
member would have met the requirements of KRS 161.600(1)[ or (2), as
applicable]. In exercising this right, the surviving widow or widower shall be
entitled to receive an annuity for life. This subsection applies to surviving
spouses of members who die on or after July 1, 1978. A surviving widow or
widower of a member who dies after July 1, 1978, shall be eligible for benefit
payments provided under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection until they
begin receiving payments under this provision;
(2) (a) Where there are surviving unmarried children under age eighteen (18) or
under age nineteen (19) if a full-time student in high school, the benefit shall
be two hundred dollars ($200) per month in the case of one (1) child, three
hundred forty dollars ($340) per month in the case of two (2) children, four
hundred dollars ($400) per month in the case of three (3) children, and four
hundred forty dollars ($440) per month in the case of four (4) or more
children. Benefits under this subsection shall apply in addition to benefits
which may be payable under subsections (1) and (3) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the surviving spouse
may elect to receive a lump-sum refund of the member's accumulated account
balance in lieu of the survivorship benefits payable under this subsection and
subsection (1) of this section only if the surviving spouse is designated as the
primary beneficiary and:
1. Is a biological or adoptive parent of all children eligible for a benefit
Page 51 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
under this subsection and has not had his or her parental rights
terminated; or
2. Has been appointed as legal guardian of all of the children eligible under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) To elect a lump-sum refund of the member's accumulated account balance
under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the surviving spouse who is designated
as the primary beneficiary must sign a waiver on forms prescribed by the
retirement system of his or her rights and the member's children's rights to the
survivorship benefits payable under this subsection and subsection (1) of this
section. The surviving spouse shall not waive the survivorship benefits
available under this subsection or subsections (1) and (6) of this section if any
of the member's children have attained age eighteen (18) or older unless all of
those children consent in writing on forms prescribed by the retirement
system to waive their survivorship benefits available under this subsection;
(3) (a) Where the survivor is a child age eighteen (18) or older whose mental or
physical condition is sufficient to cause his or her dependency on the deceased
member at the time of the member's death, the benefit shall be two hundred
dollars ($200) per month, payable for the life of the child or until the time as
the mental or physical condition creating the dependency no longer exists or
the child marries. The mental or physical condition of the adult child shall be
revealed by a competent examination by a licensed physician and shall be
approved by a majority of a medical review committee as defined in KRS
161.661(14). Benefits under this subsection shall apply in addition to benefits
which may be payable under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the surviving spouse
shall not elect to receive a lump-sum refund of the member's accumulated
account balance in lieu of the survivorship benefits payable under this
Page 52 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
subsection and subsection (1) of this section unless:
1. The surviving spouse is designated as the primary beneficiary;
2. The surviving spouse has been appointed by the court as guardian,
conservator, or other fiduciary with sufficient general or specific
authority to waive the survivorship benefits available under this
subsection for any child or children age eighteen (18) or older who have
been adjudicated incompetent to make decisions on their own behalf by
a court of law; and
3. Any child or children age eighteen (18) or older who are mentally
competent to make decisions on their own behalf consent in writing on
forms prescribed by the retirement system to waive their survivorship
benefits available under this subsection.
(c) If eligible to elect a lump-sum refund of the member's accumulated account
balance, the surviving spouse shall sign a waiver on forms prescribed by the
retirement system of his or her rights and the member's children's rights to the
survivorship benefits payable under this subsection and subsections (1) and
(2) of this section;
(4) Where the sole eligible survivors are dependent parents aged sixty-five (65) or over,
the benefit shall be two hundred dollars ($200) per month for one (1) parent or two
hundred ninety dollars ($290) per month for two (2) parents. Dependency of a
parent shall be established as of the date of the death of the member;
(5) Where the sole eligible survivor is a dependent brother or sister, the benefit shall be
one hundred sixty five dollars ($165) per month. In order to qualify, the brother or
sister must have been a resident of the deceased member's household for at least
one (1) full year prior to the member's death or must have been receiving care in a
hospital, nursing home, or other institution at the member's expense for same
period;
Page 53 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(6) The benefit to a child as defined in subsection (2) of this section shall terminate
upon the attainment of age eighteen (18) or upon reaching age nineteen (19), if a
full-time student in high school, or upon marriage, except that benefits shall
continue until the attainment of age twenty-three (23) for an unmarried child who is
a full-time student in a recognized educational program beyond the high school
level. The benefit to a dependent parent or dependent brother or sister or dependent
child age eighteen (18) or older shall terminate upon marriage, or upon termination
of the condition creating the dependency;
(7) The board of trustees shall be the sole judge of eligibility or dependency of any
beneficiary, and may require formal application or information relating to eligibility
or dependency, including proof of annual income satisfactory to the board. The
board of trustees may subpoena records and individuals whenever it deems this
action necessary;
(8) No payment of benefits shall be made unless the board of trustees authorizes the
payment. The board shall promulgate administrative regulations for the
administration of the provisions in this section and in every case the decision of the
board of trustees shall be final as to eligibility, dependency, or disability, and the
amount of benefits payable;
(9) In the event that there are no eligible survivors as defined in subsections (1) to (5)
of this section, or in the event that the surviving spouse elects not to receive
survivorship benefits on his or her own behalf or on behalf of any of the member's
children as permitted under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the board of
trustees shall pay to the estate or the designated beneficiaries of the deceased
member a refund of his or her accumulated account balance as provided in KRS
161.470(7). If the benefits paid or payable under subsections (1) to (5) of this
section and KRS 161.661 shall amount to a sum less than the member's
accumulated account balance at the time of death, the board of trustees shall pay to
Page 54 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
the estate or designated beneficiaries of the deceased member the balance of the
accumulated account balance;
(10) Any person who is receiving benefits and becomes disqualified from receiving
those benefits under this section shall immediately notify the Teachers' Retirement
System of this disqualification in writing and shall return all benefits paid after the
date of disqualification. Failure to comply with these provisions shall create an
indebtedness of that person to the Teachers' Retirement System. Interest at the rate
of eight percent (8%) per annum shall be charged if the debt is not repaid within
sixty (60) days after the date of disqualification. Failure to repay this debt creates a
lien in favor of the Teachers' Retirement System upon all property of the person
who improperly receives benefits and does not repay those benefits; and
(11) Benefits under subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall apply to a child who is a
legally adopted survivor at the time of the death of the member. This provision shall
be retroactive to include a child who was born after January 1, 1990, and is a legally
adopted survivor of a member whose death occurred prior to July 15, 2008.
Section 13. KRS 161.548 is amended to read as follows:
A member of the Teachers' Retirement System who is in an active contributing status
with the system, and who was formerly employed in a regional community service
program for mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability, organized and
operated under the provisions of KRS 210.370 to 210.480, which does not participate in a
state-administered retirement system, may obtain credit for the period of his or her
service in the regional community program for mental health and individuals with an
intellectual disability by paying to the Teachers' Retirement System the full actuarial cost
of the service credit purchased, as provided in KRS 161.220(22). The service credit
purchased may not be used for meeting the service requirements set forth in KRS
161.600(1)(a)[ or (2)] or 161.661(1). The payment shall not be picked up, as described in
KRS 161.540(2), and the entire payment shall be placed in the teachers' savings fund.
Page 55 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
Section 14. KRS 161.549 is amended to read as follows:
A member of the Teachers' Retirement System who is in an active contributing status
with the system, and who was formerly employed by a Federal Head Start agency,
operated under 42 U.S.C. secs. 9831 et seq., which does not participate in a state-
administered retirement system, may obtain credit for the period of the member's service
in the Head Start program by purchasing this service credit under the same conditions
that out-of-state service credit may be purchased under KRS 161.515. The service credit
purchased may not be used for meeting the service requirements set forth in KRS
161.600(1)(a)[ or (2)] or 161.661(1). Payment for the service credit purchased may be
made in installments in lieu of a lump-sum payment. The payment shall not be picked up,
as described in KRS 161.540(2), and the entire payment shall be placed in the teachers'
savings fund.
Section 15. KRS 161.605 is amended to read as follows:
Any member retired by reason of service may return to work in a position covered by the
Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System and continue to receive his or her retirement
allowance under the following conditions:
(1) Any member who is retired with thirty (30) or more years of service may return to
work in a full-time or a part-time position, or in a position providing substitute
teaching service, covered by the Teachers' Retirement System and earn up to a
maximum of seventy-five percent (75%) of the member's last annual compensation
measured on a daily rate to be determined by the board of trustees. For purposes of
determining whether the salary of a member returning to work is seventy-five
percent (75%) or less of the member's last annual compensation, all remuneration
paid and benefits provided to the member, on an actual dollar or fair market value
basis as determined by the retirement system, excluding employer-provided medical
insurance required under subsection (5) of this section, shall be considered.
Members who were retired on or before June 30, 2002, shall be entitled to return to
Page 56 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
work under the provisions of this section as if they had retired with thirty (30) years
of service. Nonqualified service credit purchased under the provisions of KRS
161.5465 or elsewhere with any state-administered retirement system shall not be
used to meet the thirty (30) year requirement set forth in this subsection. Out-of
state teaching service provided in public schools for kindergarten through grade
twelve (12) may count toward the thirty (30) year requirement set forth in this
subsection even if it is not purchased as service credit, if the member obtains from
his or her out-of-state employer certification of this service on forms prescribed by
the retirement system;
(2) Any member who is retired with less than thirty (30) years of service after June 30,
2002, may return to work in a full-time or part-time position, or in a position
providing substitute teaching service, covered by the Teachers' Retirement System
and earn up to a maximum of sixty-five percent (65%) of the member's last annual
compensation measured on a daily rate to be determined by the board of trustees.
For purposes of determining whether the salary of a member returning to work is
sixty-five percent (65%) or less of the member's last annual compensation, all
remuneration paid and benefits provided to the member, on an actual dollar or fair
market value basis as determined by the retirement system, excluding employer-
provided medical insurance required under subsection (5) of this section, shall be
considered;
(3) Reemployment of a retired member under subsection (1) or (2) of this section in a
full-time teaching or nonteaching position in a local school district shall be
permitted only if the employer certifies to the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement
System that there are no other qualified applicants available to fill the teaching or
nonteaching position. The employer may use any source considered reliable,
including but not limited to data provided by the Education Professional Standards
Board and the Department of Education, to determine whether other qualified
Page 57 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
applicants are available to fill the teaching or nonteaching position. The Kentucky
Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish
procedures to determine whether other qualified applicants are available to fill a
teaching or nonteaching position and, if not, for filling the position with a retired
member who will then be permitted to return to work in that position under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section. The administrative regulations shall ensure that
a retired member shall not be hired in a teaching or nonteaching position by a local
school district until the superintendent of the school district assures the Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System that every reasonable effort has been made to recruit
other qualified applicants for the position on an annual basis;
(4) Under this section, an employer may employ full-time a number of retired members
not to exceed three percent (3%) of the membership actively employed full-time by
that employer. The board of trustees may reduce this three percent (3%) cap upon
recommendation of the retirement system's actuary if a reduction is necessary to
maintain the actuarial soundness of the retirement system. The board of trustees
may increase the three percent (3%) cap upon a determination that an increase is
warranted to help address a shortage in the number of available teachers and upon
the determination of the retirement system's actuary that the proposed cap increase
allows the actuarial soundness of the retirement system to be maintained. For
purposes of this subsection, "full-time" means the same as defined by KRS
161.220(21). A local school district may exceed the quota established by this
subsection by making an annual written request to the Kentucky Department of
Education which the department may approve on a year-by-year basis if the
statewide quota has not been met. A district's written request to exceed its quota
shall be submitted no sooner than two (2) weeks after the start of the school year;
(5) (a) Except as provided by subsection (10) of this section, a member returning to
work in a full-time or part-time position, or in a position providing substitute
Page 58 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
teaching service, under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall contribute to
an account with the retirement system that shall be administered
independently from and with no reciprocal impact with the member's original
retirement account, or any other account from which the member is eligible to
draw a retirement allowance.
(b) Except as provided by subsection (10) of this section, a member returning to
work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall make contributions to the
retirement system at the rate provided under KRS 161.540. The new account
shall independently meet all vesting requirements as well as all other
conditions set forth in KRS 161.600(1)[ or (2), as applicable,] before any
retirement allowance is payable from this account. The retirement allowance
accruing under this new account shall be calculated pursuant to KRS 161.620.
This new account shall not entitle the member to a duplication of the benefits
offered under KRS 161.620(7) or 161.675, nor shall this new account provide
the benefits offered by KRS 161.520, 161.525, 161.620(3), 161.655, 161.661,
or 161.663.
(c) A member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall
waive his or her medical insurance with the Teachers' Retirement System
during the period of reemployment and shall receive the medical insurance
coverage that is generally provided by the member's active employer to the
other members of the retirement system that the active employer employs. If
medical insurance coverage is not available from the employer, the Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System may provide coverage for the member.
(d) A member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall
not be eligible to purchase service credit for any service provided after the
member's effective date of retirement but prior to the date that the member
returns to work. A member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of
Page 59 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
this section shall not be eligible to purchase service credit that the member
would have otherwise been eligible to purchase prior to the member's initial
retirement.
(e) A member who returns to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or
in the event of the death of the member, the member's estate or applicably
designated beneficiary, shall be entitled, within ninety (90) days of the posting
of the annual report submitted by the employer, to a refund of contributions as
permitted and limited by KRS 161.470;
(6) The board of trustees may annually, on July 1, adjust the current daily rate of a
member's last annual compensation, for each full twelve (12) month period that has
elapsed subsequent to the member earning his or her last annual compensation, by
the percentage increase in the annual average of the consumer price index for all
urban consumers for the calendar year preceding the adjustment as published by the
Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics, not to exceed five percent (5%) annually. Each
annual adjustment shall become part of the member's daily rate base. Failure to
comply with the salary limitations set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this section
as may be adjusted by this subsection shall result in a reduction of the member's
retirement allowance or any other benefit to which the member would otherwise be
entitled on a dollar-for-dollar basis for each dollar that the member exceeds these
salary limitations, and the member shall be refunded his or her retirement
contributions made on the compensation that exceeds these salary limitations.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a member retiring from
a local school district who returns to work for a local school district under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be entitled, without any reduction to his or
her retirement allowance or any other retirement benefit, to earn a minimum
amount equal to one hundred seventy dollars ($170) per day;
(7) (a) A retired member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section
Page 60 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
shall have separated from service for a period of at least one (1) year if
returning to work for the same employer on a full-time basis, and at least three
(3) months if returning to work for a different employer on a full-time basis.
A retired member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section
on a part-time basis shall have separated from service for a period of at least
three (3) months before returning to work for any employer.
(b) As an alternative to the separation-from-service requirements in paragraph (a)
of this subsection, a retired member who is returning to work for the same
employer in a full-time position under subsections (1) and (2) of this section
may elect a separation-from-service of not less than two (2) months followed
by a forfeiture of the retired member's retirement allowance on a month-to-
month basis for each month that the member has separated from service for
less than twelve (12) full months. A retired member returning to work for the
same employer in a part-time position, or for a different employer in a full-
time position, may elect an alternative separation-from-service requirement of
at least two (2) months followed by a forfeiture of the member's retirement
allowance for one (1) month. During the period that the member forfeits his or
her retirement allowance and thereafter, member and employer contributions
shall be made to the retirement system as a result of employment in any
position subject to membership in the retirement system. The member shall
contribute to an account with the retirement system subject to the conditions
set forth in subsection (5) of this section.
(c) A retired member who is returning to work for an employer that has
employees who participate in the Teachers' Retirement System shall comply
with the separation-from-service requirements in this subsection before
performing any service for the employer, regardless of whether the retired
member is providing service in a position covered by the Teachers'
Page 61 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
Retirement System.
(d) The starting date for any separation from service required under this
subsection shall be the effective date of the member's retirement.
(e) The separation-from-service requirements of this subsection are not met if
there is a prearranged agreement between the member and an employer that
has employees who participate in the Teachers' Retirement System prior to
retirement for the member to work for the employer after retirement.
(f) The Teachers' Retirement System may require the member and the employer
for which the member is returning to work to certify in writing on a form
prescribed by the Teachers' Retirement System that no prearranged agreement
was or will be entered into between the member and employer prior to
retirement for the member to work for the employer after retirement.
(g) Failure to comply with the separation-from-service requirements in this
subsection voids a member's retirement and the member shall be required to
return all the retirement benefits he or she received, with interest, for the
period of time that the member returned to work without a sufficient
separation from service;
(8) (a) Effective July 1, 2004, local school districts may employ retired members in
full-time or part-time teaching or administrative positions without limitation
on the compensation of the retired members that is otherwise required by
subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Under provisions of this subsection, a
local school district may only employ retired members to fill critical shortage
positions for which there are no other qualified applicants as determined by
the local superintendent. The number of retired members that a local school
district may employ under this subsection shall be no more than two (2)
members per local school district or one percent (1%) of the total active
members employed by the local school district on a full-time basis as defined
Page 62 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
under KRS 161.220(21), whichever number is greater. Retired members
returning to work under this subsection shall be subject to the separation-
from-service requirements set forth in subsection (7) of this section. Retired
members returning to work under this subsection shall waive their medical
insurance coverage with the retirement system during their period of
reemployment and receive medical insurance coverage that is offered to other
full-time members employed by the local school district. Retired members
returning to work under this subsection shall contribute to an account subject
to the conditions set forth in subsection (5) of this section. Retired members
returning to work under this subsection shall make contributions to the
retirement system at the rate provided under KRS 161.540. The employer
shall make contributions at the rate provided under KRS 161.550. Local
school districts shall make annual payments to the retirement system on the
compensation paid to the reemployed retirees at the rates determined by the
retirement system's actuary that reflect any accrued liability resulting from the
reemployment of these members.
(b) The Department of Education may employ retired members in full-time or
part-time teaching or nonteaching positions without the limitations on
compensation otherwise required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section to
fill critical shortage areas in the schools it operates, including the Kentucky
School for the Blind, the Kentucky School for the Deaf, and the Kentucky
Virtual High School, and to serve on audit teams. The department shall be
subject to the same requirements as local school districts as provided in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, except the Teachers' Retirement System shall
determine the maximum number of employees that may be employed under
this paragraph;
(9) The return-to-work limitations set forth in this section shall apply to retired
Page 63 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
members who are returning to work in the same position from which they retired, or
a position substantially similar to the one from which they retired, or a position
described in KRS 161.046 or any position listed in KRS 161.220(4) which requires
membership in the retirement system. Positions which generally require
certification or graduation from a four (4) year college or university as a condition
of employment which are created, or changed to remove the position from coverage
under KRS 161.220(4) are also subject to the return to work limitations set forth in
this section. The board of trustees shall determine whether employment in a
nonteaching position is subject to this subsection;
(10) [(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, individuals who become
members on or after January 1, 2022, who subsequently retire and begin
drawing a monthly lifetime retirement allowance from the Teachers'
Retirement System, who following retirement are reemployed with an
employer participating in the Teachers' Retirement System, shall not be
eligible to contribute to or earn benefits in a second retirement account in the
Teachers' Retirement System during the period of reemployment.
(b) ]The provisions of subsections (1) to (8) of this section are not subject to KRS
161.714;
(11) Any member retired by reason of service may waive his or her annuity and return to
full-time employment in a position covered by the Teachers' Retirement System
under the following conditions:
(a) The member shall receive no annuity payments while employed in a covered
position, shall waive his or her medical insurance coverage with the Teachers'
Retirement System during the period of reemployment, and shall receive the
medical insurance coverage that is generally offered by the member's active
employer to the other members of the retirement system employed by the
active employer. The member's estate or, if there is a beneficiary applicably
Page 64 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
designated by the member, then the beneficiary, shall continue to be eligible
for life insurance benefits as provided in KRS 161.655. Service subsequent to
retirement shall not be used to improve an annuity, except as provided in
paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection;
(b) Any member who waives regular annuity benefits and returns to teaching or
covered employment shall be entitled to make contributions on the salaries
received for this service and have his or her retirement annuity recalculated as
provided in the regular retirement formula in KRS 161.620(1), less any
applicable actuarial discount applied to the original retirement allowance due
to the election of a joint and last survivor option. Retirement option and
beneficiary designation on original retirement shall not be altered by
postretirement employment, and dependents and spouses of the members shall
not become eligible for benefits under KRS 161.520, 161.525, or 161.661
because of postretirement employment;
(c) When a member returns to full-time teaching or covered employment as
provided in subsection (b) of this section, the employer is required to withhold
and remit regular retirement contributions. The member must be employed
full-time for at least one (1) consecutive contract year to be eligible to
improve an annuity. The member shall be returned to the annuity rolls on July
1 following completion of the contract year or on the first day of the month
following the month of termination of service if full-time employment
exceeds one (1) consecutive contract year. A member shall not be returned to
the annuity rolls until after he or she has filed a retirement application in
compliance with KRS 161.600(5)[(6)]. Any discounts applied at the time of
the original retirement due to service or age may be reduced or eliminated due
to additional employment if full-time employment is for one (1) consecutive
contract year or longer; and
Page 65 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(d) A member retired by reason of service who has been employed the equivalent
of twenty-five (25) days or more during a school year under KRS 161.605
may waive the member's retirement annuity and return to regular employment
covered by the Teachers' Retirement System during that school year a
maximum of one (1) time during any five (5) year period, beginning with that
school year;
(12) Retired members may be employed in a part-time teaching capacity by an agency
described in KRS 161.220(4)(b) or (n), not to exceed the equivalent of twelve (12)
teaching hours in any one (1) fiscal year. Retired members may be employed for a
period not to exceed the equivalent of one hundred (100) days in any one (1) fiscal
year in a part-time administrative or nonteaching capacity by an agency described
in KRS 161.220(4)(b) or (n) in a position that would otherwise be covered by the
retirement system. Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, the return to
work provisions set forth in subsections (1) to (8) of this section shall not apply to
retired members who return to work solely for an agency described in KRS
161.220(4)(b) or (n). Calculation of the number of days and teaching hours for part-
time teaching, substitute teaching, or part-time employment in a nonteaching
capacity under this section shall not exceed the ratio between a school year and the
actual months of retirement for the member during that school year. The board of
trustees by administrative regulation may establish fractional equivalents of a day
of teaching service. Any member who exceeds the twelve (12) hour or one hundred
(100) day limitations of this subsection shall be subject to having his or her
retirement voided and be required to return all retirement allowances and other
benefits paid to the member or on the member's behalf since the effective date of
retirement. In lieu of voiding a member's retirement, the system may reduce the
member's retirement allowance or any other benefit to which the member would
otherwise be entitled on a dollar-for-dollar basis for each dollar of compensation
Page 66 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
that the member earns in employment exceeding twelve (12) hours, one hundred
(100) days, or any apportionment of the two (2) combined. Retired members
returning to work for an employer described in KRS 161.220(4)(b) or (n) shall
comply with the separation-from-service requirements of subsection (7) of this
section;
(13) When a retired member returns to employment in a part-time teaching capacity or
in a nonteaching capacity as provided in subsection (12) of this section, the
employer shall contribute annually to the retirement system on the compensation
paid to the retired member at rates determined by the retirement system actuary that
reflect accrued liability for retired members who return to work under subsection
(12) of this section; and
(14) For retired members who return to work during any one (1) fiscal year in both a
position described in KRS 161.220(4)(b) or (n) and in a position described under
another provision under KRS 161.220(4), and for retired members who return to
work in a position described under KRS 161.220(4)(b) or (n) in both a teaching and
an administrative or nonteaching capacity, the board of trustees shall adopt a
methodology for a pro rata apportionment of days and hours that the retired
member may work in each position.
Section 16. KRS 161.612 is amended to read as follows:
Effective July 1, 2002, any individual occupying a position on a part-time basis that
requires certification or graduation from a four (4) year college or university as a
condition of employment and any individual providing part-time or substitute teaching
services that are the same or similar to those teaching services provided by certified, full-
time teachers shall be a member of the Teachers' Retirement System, according to the
conditions and only to the extent set forth in this section, if the individual is employed by
one (1) of the public boards, institutions, or agencies set forth in KRS 161.220, excluding
those public boards, institutions, and agencies described in KRS 161.220(4)(b) and (n).
Page 67 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
Members providing part-time and substitute services shall participate in the retirement
system as follows:
(1) Members providing part-time and substitute services shall accrue service credit as
provided under KRS 161.500 and be entitled to a retirement allowance upon
meeting the service retirement conditions of KRS 161.600. The board of trustees
shall adopt a methodology for accrediting service credit to these members on a pro
rata basis. The methodology adopted by the board of trustees may be amended as
necessary to ensure its actuarial soundness. The retirement allowance for members
providing part-time and substitute services shall be calculated pursuant to KRS
161.620[ and 161.635 or 161.636, as applicable], except that the provisions of KRS
161.620(3) shall not apply. Members providing part-time and substitute services
who meet the service retirement conditions of KRS 161.600 may also be eligible to
participate as approved by the board of trustees in the medical insurance program
provided by the retirement system under KRS 161.675. Members providing part-
time and substitute services shall make contributions to the Teachers' Retirement
System at the rate provided under KRS 161.540. A member who provides part-time
or substitute services, or in the event of the death of the member, the member's
estate or applicably designated beneficiary, will be entitled, within ninety (90) days
of the posting of the annual report submitted by the member's employer, to a refund
of contributions as permitted and limited by KRS 161.470;
(2) (a) 1. The board of trustees shall adopt eligibility conditions under which
members providing part-time and substitute services may participate in
the benefits provided under KRS 161.520, 161.655, 161.661, and
161.663.
2. For all disability retirement applications filed with the Teachers'
Retirement System on or after July 1, 2021, disability retirement
payments and any other recurring payments payable by any other state-
Page 68 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
administered retirement system to members providing part-time or
substitute services shall be applied to reduce, on a dollar-for-dollar
basis, the minimum monthly disability retirement allowance of five
hundred dollars ($500) provided for under KRS 161.661(6).
3. Effective July 1, 2021, members providing part-time or substitute
services shall not be eligible to apply for a disability retirement
allowance if they are eligible for a service retirement allowance that is
not subject to an actuarial reduction required under KRS 161.600(1)(b)
or (d).
(b) The board of trustees may permit members providing part-time or substitute
services to participate in other benefits offered by the retirement system by
promulgating administrative regulations that establish eligibility conditions
for participation in these benefits. All eligibility conditions adopted by the
board of trustees pursuant to this subsection may be amended as necessary to
ensure their actuarial soundness;
(3) In addition to the pro rata methodology adopted by the board of trustees under
subsection (1) of this section, members providing part-time and substitute services
shall be subject to all limitations and conditions regarding the accrual, retention,
accreditation, and use of service credit that apply to members providing full-time
services. In addition to the eligibility conditions set forth by the board of trustees
under subsection (2) of this section, members providing part-time and substitute
services shall be subject to all limitations and conditions regarding both the
eligibility to participate and the extent of participation in any benefit offered under
KRS 161.220 to 161.716 that apply to members providing full-time services;
(4) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section to the contrary, instructional
assistants who provide teaching services in the local school districts on a full-time
basis in positions covered by the County Employees Retirement System who are
Page 69 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
used as substitute teachers on an emergency basis for five (5) days or less during
any one (1) fiscal year shall not be considered members of the Teachers' Retirement
System during that period in which they are serving as substitute teachers for five
(5) days or less;
(5) The board of trustees may adopt a pro rata methodology to determine the annual
compensation of members providing part-time and substitute services in order to
determine benefits provided under KRS 161.661 and 161.663. Members providing
part-time and substitute services who had retirement contributions posted to their
accounts during the previous fiscal year and who have not had those contributions
refunded to them are eligible to vote for the board of trustees;
(6) The board of trustees of the Teachers' Retirement System shall be responsible for
final determination of membership eligibility and may direct employers to take
whatever action that may be necessary to correct any error relating to membership;
and
(7) The provisions of this section are not subject to KRS 161.714.
Section 17. KRS 161.630 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A member, upon retirement, shall receive a retirement allowance in the form
of a life annuity, with refundable balance, as provided in KRS 161.620, unless
an election is made before the effective date of retirement to receive
actuarially equivalent benefits under options which the board of trustees
approves.
(b) [An individual who is participating in the supplemental benefit component as
provided by KRS 161.635 or 161.636 may, before the effective date of
retirement, elect to receive his or her accumulated account balance accrued in
the supplemental benefit component annuitized into a monthly payment under
one (1) of the actuarial equivalent payment options approved by the board of
trustees.
Page 70 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
(c) ]No option shall provide for a benefit with an actuarial value at the age of
retirement greater than that provided in KRS 161.620[, 161.635(5)(a), or
161.636(5)(a), as applicable]. This section does not apply to disability
allowances as provided in KRS 161.661(1).
(2) The retirement option chosen by a retiree at the time of service retirement shall
remain in force unless the retiree elects to make a change under the following
conditions:
(a) A divorce, annulment, or marriage dissolution following retirement shall, at
the election of the retiree, cancel any optional plan selected at retirement that
provides indefinitely continuing benefits to a spousal beneficiary and return
the retiree to a single lifetime benefit equivalent as determined by the board;
or
(b) Following marriage or remarriage, or the death of the designated beneficiary,
a retiree may elect a new optional plan of payment based on the actuarial
equivalent of a single lifetime benefit at the time of the election, as
determined by the board. The plan shall become effective the first of the
month following receipt of an application on a form approved by the board.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a beneficiary designation shall not be
changed after the effective date of retirement except for retirees who elect the life
annuity with refundable balance or the predetermined years certain and life
thereafter option. A member may remove a beneficiary at any time, but shall not
designate a substitute beneficiary. If a member elects to remove a beneficiary, the
member's retirement allowance shall not change regardless of the retirement option
selected by the member, even if the removed beneficiary predeceases the member.
(4) A member who experiences a qualifying event under subsection (2) of this section
and who elects a new optional plan of payment shall make that election within sixty
(60) days of the qualifying event.
Page 71 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
Section 18. KRS 161.661 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any member who is accredited by the Teachers' Retirement System for five
(5) or more years of service in Kentucky after July 1, 1941, may retire for
disability and be granted a disability allowance if found to be eligible as
provided in this section. Application for disability benefits shall be made
within one (1) year of the last contributing service in Kentucky, and the
disability must have occurred during the most recent period of employment in
a position covered by the Teachers' Retirement System and subsequent to the
accreditation by the Teachers' Retirement System of five (5) years of
retirement system service credit in Kentucky. A disability occurring during
the regular vacation immediately following the last period of active service in
Kentucky or during an official leave for which the member is entitled to make
regular contributions to the retirement system, shall be considered as having
occurred during a period of active service.
(b) The annual disability allowance shall be equal to sixty percent (60%) of the
member's final average salary.
(c) The following individuals shall not be eligible for disability benefits under
this section:
1. Members with twenty-seven (27) or more years of service credit; and
2. Individuals who become members on or after July 1, 2021, who are
eligible for an unreduced benefit under KRS 161.600(1)(b)2. or (d).
(2) The provisions of KRS 161.520, 161.525, and subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this
section shall not apply to disability retirees whose benefits were calculated on the
service retirement formula nor to survivors of these members.
(3) Members shall earn one (1) year of entitlement to disability retirement, at sixty
percent (60%) of the member's final average salary, for each four (4) years of
service in a covered position, but any member meeting the service requirement for
Page 72 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
disability retirement shall be credited with no less than five (5) years of eligibility.
(4) A member retired by reason of disability shall continue to earn service credit at the
rate of one (1) year for each year retired for disability. This service shall be credited
to the member's account at the expiration of entitlement as defined in subsection (3)
of this section, or when the member's eligibility for disability benefits is terminated
upon recommendation of a medical review committee, and this service shall be
used in calculating benefits as provided in subsection (5) of this section, but under
no circumstances shall this service be used to provide the member with more than
twenty-seven (27) years of total service credit. The service credit shall be valued at
the same level as service earned by active members as provided under KRS 161.600
or 161.620.
(5) Any member retired by reason of disability and remaining disabled at the expiration
of the entitlement period shall have his or her disability benefits recalculated using
the service retirement formula with service credit earned as set out in subsection (4)
of this section. The retirement allowance shall be calculated as set forth in KRS
161.620, except that those persons less than sixty (60) years of age shall be
considered as sixty (60) years of age. Members having their disability benefits
recalculated under this subsection shall not be entitled to a benefit based upon an
average of their three (3) highest salaries as set forth in KRS 161.220(9), unless
approved otherwise by the board of trustees.
(6) Members who have their disability retirement allowance recalculated at the
expiration of the entitlement period shall continue to have coverage under the post-
retirement medical insurance program. Restrictions on employment shall remain in
effect until the member attains age seventy (70) or until the member's eligibility is
discontinued. KRS 161.520 and 161.525 shall not apply to survivors of disability
retirees whose retirement allowances have been recalculated at the expiration of the
entitlement period. Members who have their disability retirement allowance
Page 73 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
recalculated at the expiration of their entitlement period shall be entitled to a
minimum monthly allowance of five hundred dollars ($500) as the basic straight
life annuity. The minimum allowance shall be effective July 1, 1992, and shall
apply to those members who have had their allowance recalculated prior to that date
and to disability retirees who will have their benefit allowance recalculated on or
after that date. For individuals who become members on or after July 1, 2021,
disability retirement payments and any other recurring payments payable by any
other state-administered retirement system shall be applied to reduce, on a dollar-
for-dollar basis, the minimum monthly disability retirement allowance payable
under this subsection.
(7) Effective July 1, 1992, members retired for disability prior to July 1, 1964, shall be
entitled to a minimum monthly allowance of five hundred dollars ($500) as their
basic straight life annuity and their surviving spouse shall be eligible for survivor
benefits as provided in KRS 161.520(1)(a) and (b).
(8) Any member retired by reason of disability may voluntarily waive disability
benefits and return to teaching or any member, who is age sixty (60) years or older,
may elect to waive disability benefits and retire for service on the basis of service
credited to the member on the effective date of the disability retirement.
(9) In order to qualify for retirement by reason of disability a member must suffer from
a physical or mental condition presumed to be permanent in duration and of a
nature as to render the member incapable of being gainfully employed in a covered
position. The incapability must be revealed by a competent examination by a
licensed physician or physicians and must be approved by a majority of a medical
review committee.
(10) A member retired by reason of disability shall be required to undergo periodic
examinations at the discretion of the board of trustees to determine whether the
disability allowance shall be continued. When examination and recommendation of
Page 74 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
a medical review committee indicate the disability no longer exists, the allowance
shall be discontinued.
(11) Eligibility for payment shall begin on the first day of the month following receipt of
the application in the Teachers' Retirement System office, or the first of the month
next following the last payment of salary or sick leave benefits by the employer,
whichever is the later date.
(12) No person who receives a disability allowance may be employed in a position that
entails duties or qualification requirements similar to positions subject to
participation in the retirement system either within or without the State of
Kentucky. So doing shall constitute a misdemeanor and shall result in loss of the
allowance from the first date of this service. For purposes of this subsection and
subsection (13) of this section, "employment" and "occupation," and derivatives
thereof, mean any activity engaged in by the member receiving disability allowance
from which income is earned. A member who applies for and is approved for
disability retirement on or after July 1, 2002, and whose annual disability benefit is
less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) may earn income in any occupation other
than covered employment only to the extent that the annual income from the other
employment when added to the annual disability benefit does not exceed forty
thousand dollars ($40,000). For any member who exceeds this limit as a result of
income from other employment, the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System shall
reduce the member's disability benefit on a dollar-for-dollar basis for each dollar
that the member's combined annual disability benefit and annual income from other
employment exceeds forty thousand dollars ($40,000). The board of trustees may
annually increase the forty thousand dollar ($40,000) limit by the percentage
increase in the annual average of the consumer price index for all urban consumers
for the most recent calendar year as published by the Federal Bureau of Labor
Statistics, not to exceed five percent (5%). The retirement system may require
Page 75 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
income verification from the member, including but not limited to copies of tax
returns and federal forms W-2 and W-4P.
(13) All members who applied for disability retirement before July 1, 2002, and were
approved as a result of that application shall be subject to the income limitations as
they existed on June 30, 2002, until July 1, 2006. Effective July 1, 2006, the
twenty-seven thousand dollar ($27,000) limitation shall be increased to forty
thousand dollars ($40,000) and may be adjusted by the board of trustees by the
consumer price index in the manner described in subsection (12) of this section.
The recipient of a disability allowance who engages in any gainful occupation other
than covered employment must make a report of the duties involved, compensation
received, and any other pertinent information required by the board of trustees. The
retirement system may require income verification from the member, including but
not limited to copies of tax returns and federal forms W-2 and W-4P.
(14) The board of trustees shall designate medical review committees, each consisting of
three (3) licensed physicians. A medical review committee shall pass upon all
applications for disability retirement and upon all applicant statements, medical
certifications, and examinations submitted in connection with disability
applications. The disposition of each case shall be recommended by a medical
review committee in writing to the retirement system. Members of a medical review
committee shall follow administrative regulations regarding procedures as the board
of trustees may enact and shall be paid reasonable fees and expenses as authorized
by the board of trustees in compliance with the provisions of KRS 161.330 and
161.340. The retirement system may secure additional medical examinations and
information as it deems necessary. A member may appeal any final agency decision
denying his or her disability retirement application pursuant to the provisions of
KRS 161.250(2).
(15) A disability may be presumed to be permanent if the condition creating the
Page 76 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
disability may be reasonably expected to continue for one (1) year or more from the
date of application for disability benefits.
(16) Any member who has voluntarily waived disability benefits or whose disability
benefits have been discontinued on recommendation of a medical review
committee, may apply for reinstatement of disability benefits. The application for
reinstatement must be made to the retirement system within twelve (12) months of
the date disability benefits terminated. If the termination of benefits were voluntary,
the reinstatement may be made without medical examination if application is made
within three (3) months of the termination date. Other applications for reinstatement
will be processed in the same manner as new applications for benefits.
(17) No person who is receiving disability benefits under this section may be employed
in a position which qualifies the person for membership in a retirement system
financed wholly or in part with public funds. Employment in a position prohibited
by this subsection shall result in disqualification for those disability benefits from
the date of employment in the prohibited position.
(18) Any person who is receiving benefits and becomes disqualified from receiving
those benefits under this section, or becomes disqualified from receiving a portion
of those benefits due to income from other than covered employment, shall
immediately notify the Teachers' Retirement System of this disqualification in
writing and shall return all benefits paid after the date of disqualification. Failure to
comply with these provisions shall create an indebtedness of that person to the
Teachers' Retirement System. Interest at the rate of eight percent (8%) per annum
shall be charged if the debt is not repaid within sixty (60) days after the date of
disqualification. Failure to repay this debt creates a lien in favor of the Teachers'
Retirement System upon all property of the person who improperly receives
benefits and does not repay those benefits. The Teachers' Retirement System may,
in order to collect an outstanding debt, reduce or terminate any benefit that a
Page 77 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
member is otherwise entitled to receive.
[(19) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, individuals who
become members on or after January 1, 2022, shall be eligible for an actuarially
determined disability benefit as prescribed by the board of trustees via
administrative regulations promulgated by the board. The board of trustees shall
arrange by appropriate contract or on a self-insured basis a disability plan to
provide the disability benefits and may adjust the benefits in accordance with KRS
161.633(3) or 161.634(3).]
Section 19. The following KRS sections are repealed:
161.633 Foundational component for persons who became nonuniversity members on or
after January 1, 2022 -- Valuation assessment -- Adjustments to maintain funding
level and contain costs -- Construction.
161.634 Foundational component for persons who became university members on or
after January 1, 2022 -- Valuation assessment -- Adjustments to maintain funding
level and contain costs -- Construction.
161.635 Supplemental component for persons who became nonuniversity members on
or after January 1, 2022 -- Benefit -- Contributions -- Election upon termination of
employment and upon retirement -- Plans authorized under Internal Revenue
Code.
161.636 Supplemental component for persons who became university members on or
after January 1, 2022 -- Benefit -- Contributions -- Election upon termination of
employment and upon retirement -- Plans authorized under Internal Revenue
Code.
Section 20. Individuals who became members of the Teachers' Retirement
System on or after January 1, 2022, but prior to the effective date of this Act, who would
have otherwise been eligible for the benefits and rights provided by 2021 Ky. Acts ch.
157, shall be provided the benefits and rights that were applicable to individuals who
Page 78 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1078
became members of the Teachers' Retirement System immediately prior to January 1,
2022.
Section 21. Whereas recruiting and retaining the best and brightest teachers to
educate and inspire future generations of Kentuckians is crucial to the success, health,
and financial well-being of all citizens of the Commonwealth, an emergency is declared
to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon
its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 79 of 79
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed